The Project Gutenberg EBook of Vick's Illustrated Monthly Magazine, Volume
17, No. 5, March, 1894, by Various

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and most
other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no restrictions
whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms of
the Project Gutenberg License included with this eBook or online at
www.gutenberg.org.  If you are not located in the United States, you'll have
to check the laws of the country where you are located before using this ebook.

Title: Vick's Illustrated Monthly Magazine, Volume 17, No. 5, March, 1894

Author: Various

Editor: James Vick

Release Date: September 13, 2020 [EBook #63196]

Language: English

Character set encoding: UTF-8

*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK VICK'S ILLUSTRATED MONTHLY, MARCH 1894 ***




Produced by Bryan Ness and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at https://www.pgdp.net










                                 VICK’S
                           ILLUSTRATED MONTHLY
                                MAGAZINE.

       DEVOTED TO THE PROFITABLE CULTURE OF FLOWERS AND VEGETABLES.

                           Vick Publishing Co.
                          Fifty Cents Per Year.

                     ROCHESTER, N. Y., MARCH, 1894.

                            Volume 17, No. 5.
                               New Series.

       *       *       *       *       *

COUGHS AND COLDS

are only the beginning. Lungs are weakened next, the body becomes
emaciated, and then the dreaded Consumption Germ appears.

_Scott’s Emulsion_

the Cream of Cod-liver Oil and Hypophosphites, overcomes Coughs and
Colds, strengthens the Lungs, and supplies vital energy. Physicians, the
world over, endorse it.

BABIES AND CHILDREN

and Weak Mothers respond readily to the nourishing powers of Scott’s
Emulsion. They like the taste of it, too.

Don’t be Deceived by Substitutes!

Prepared by Scott & Bowne, Chemists, New-York City. Druggists sell it.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

ORGANS $27.50 up

PIANOS, $175 up

_FREE:_

Our large 24-page Catalogue, profusely illustrated, full of information
on the proper construction of Pianos and Organs. We ship on test trial,
ask no cash in advance, sell on instalments, give greater value for the
money than any other manufacturer. Send for this book at once to

BEETHOVEN ORGAN CO.,

WASHINGTON, N. J. P. O. Box 280

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

☞ SAVE MONEY

    $90 Top Buggy      $52.50
    $65 Top Buggy       36.75
    $75 Spring Wagon    42.25
    $40 Road Wagon      24.75
    $130 4-Pass Surrey  77.50
    $15 Texas Saddle     8.25
    $15 Cowboy Saddle   25.00

Single Harness $3.75, $5.25 and $10, same as sell for $7, $10 and $18,
Double Team Harness $12, $17, $20, same as sell for $20, $30, $35. We
ship anywhere to anyone at WHOLESALE PRICES with privilege to examine
without asking one cent in advance. Buy from manufacturers, save
middlemen’s profits. World’s Fair medals awarded. Write at once for
catalogue and testimonials free. CASH BUYERS’ UNION, 158 W. Van Buren
St., B3, Chicago, Ill.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

Death to High Prices!

Buy Direct from the Factory

and save agents’ and canvassers’ commissions. Hereafter we shall sell
the Majestic direct to the consumer at factory cost. The Majestic is
recognized as the best machine for family use, and has always been sold
by our agents for $60. For a limited time we shall sell it for $22 and
furnish all attachments free of charge. Shipped on approval anywhere.
Send for a sample of its work and catalogue.

THE TILTON S. M. CO., 275 Wabash Av., Chicago, Ill.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

    Few men have ever really known,
      And few would ever guess
    What our country means by marking
      All her chattels with U.S.

    We see it on our bonds and bills,
      And on our postal cars,
    It decorates our Capitol
      Shadowed by Stripes and Stars.

    In all our barracks, posts and forts,
      It plays a leading part
    And the jolly sailor loves it
      And enshrines it in his heart.

    It may stand for United States
      Or yet for Uncle Sam,
    But there’s still another meaning
      To this simple monogram.

    Now, have you guessed the message
      Which these mystic letters bear?
    Or recognized the untold good
      They’re spreading everywhere?

    Echo the joyful tidings
      And let the people know
    That the U.S. of our nation means
      We Use Sapolio.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

AGENTS $10 a day at home selling LIGHTNING PLATER and plating Jewelry,
Watches, Tableware, Bicycles, etc. Plates finest jewelry good as new, and
on all kinds of metal with gold, silver or nickel. No experience. Anyone
can plate the first effort. Goods need plating at every house. Outfits
complete. Different sizes, all warranted. Wholesale to agents $5 up. Big
profits, good seller. Circulars free.

H. F. Delno & Co. Dept. No. 6, Columbus, O.

       *       *       *       *       *

HALM’S ANTI-RHEUMATIC AND ANTI-CATARRHAL CHEWING GUM

Cures and Prevents Rheumatism, Indigestion, Dyspepsia, Heartburn, Catarrh
and Asthma. Useful in Malaria and Fevers, Cleanses the Teeth and Promotes
the Appetite. Sweetens the Breath, Cures Tobacco Habit. Endorsed by the
Medical Faculty. Send for 10, 15 or 25 cent package. Be convinced.

SILVER, STAMPS OR POSTAL NOTE.

Geo. R. Halm, 140 W. 29th St., New York

       *       *       *       *       *

Montbretias for Spring Planting.

[Illustration]

An order of plants belonging to the Iris family, are natives of Africa,
and their general appearance is that of the gladiolus, 18 inches high.
Bloom profusely from July to October, throwing out spike after spike of
beautiful blossoms. Hardy south of the Ohio; North, lift in fall and keep
in dry sand.

=Crocosmiflora.= This is a hybrid variety, having scarlet flowers about
one and one half inch in length, borne numerously in a long panicle
standing well up above the foliage, considered hardy.

=Pottsii.= Flowers bright yellow, flashed on the outside with brick-red;
very ornamental and hardy.

=Rosea.= Flowers rose colored. =Mixed.= All colors.

_Named varieties 5c. each; 6 for 25c.; 12 for 40c. Mixed 5c. each 6 for
20c.; 12. for 35c._

       *       *       *       *       *

POPULAR SELECTED COLLECTIONS.

To all who want good sensible Collections for the Flower and Vegetable
Garden we can recommend either of the following. _All of the seeds
contained in them are our regular sized packages, and first class in
every respect._ They give to our customers a good assortment, best
adapted to produce a continued succession of the most useful kinds
throughout the year.

Several thousand of our Collections are sold annually, and to the same
people, which shows that they are perfectly satisfactory.

FLOWER SEEDS.

    No. 1—Twenty Varieties Choice Annuals, $1.00.

    No. 2—Forty Varieties Choice Annuals, $2.00.

    No. 3—“Beauteous” Collection of 60 Varieties of the Finest
    Annuals, Biennials and Perennials, $3.00.

    No. 4—“Perfection” Collection of 100 Varieties of the Finest
    Annuals, Biennials and Perennials, $5.00.

VEGETABLE SEEDS.

    No. 5—Twenty-three Varieties, for Small Garden, $1.00.

    No. 6—Forty-six Varieties. All Leading Vegetables. $2.00.

    No. 7—“Giant” Collection ($4.00 worth) of Finest Varieties of
    Vegetables for Family Garden, $3.00.

    No. 8—“Mammoth” Collection ($6.50 worth) of Finest Varieties of
    Vegetables for Family Garden, $5.00.

       *       *       *       *       *

FLORAL GUIDE, 1894, The PIONEER CATALOGUE of Vegetables and Flowers.

Contains 112 pages 8 × 10½ inches, with descriptions that describe, not
mislead; instructions that instruct, not exaggerate.

The cover is charming in harmonious blending of water color prints in
green and white, with a gold background,—a dream of beauty. 32 pages of
Novelties printed in 8 different colors. All the leading novelties and
the best of the old varieties. These hard times you cannot afford to
run any risk. Buy =Honest Goods= where you will receive =Full Measure=.
It is not necessary to advertise that Vick’s seeds grow, this is known
the world over, and also that the harvest pays. A very little spent for
proper seed will save grocer’s and doctor’s bills. Many concede Vick’s
Floral Guide the handsomest catalogue for 1894. If you love a fine garden
send address now, with 10 cents, which may be deducted from first order.

$360.00 CASH PRIZES FOR POTATOES.

JAMES VICK’S SONS, Rochester. N. Y.




VICK’S MAGAZINE.

    Vol. 17.      ROCHESTER, N. Y., MARCH, 1894.      No. 5.




MARCH


[Illustration]

    _Shifting winds and lowering sky—March._
    _Bleak and bare the brown fields lie—March._
    _Winter’s spectre now is laid,_
    _Yet Spring lingers, half afraid._

    _Haste, oh Spring, your tasks are set, March!_
    _You are late, do you forget? March!_
    _Long before this time last year,_
    _Bluebird and his mate were here._

                              —_J. Torrey Connor._




MABEL RAY’S LESSON.

BY ROSE SEELYE-MILLER.


Times had been hard, harder than common this past year, and it seemed
to Mabel Ray as though there was little bright to look forward to, and
less to encourage her in trying to do right, trying to be the Christian
she wanted to be some years ago. She had married Harry Ray three years
previous; he was a thriving young merchant, but the past year it had
seemed to the young wife as if he had grown taciturn and almost fretful
if she wanted money for any little thing which she deemed necessary.
Only this morning he had refused her money for the fur cape that she
really needed so much, especially if they were going to her folks for
New Year’s day. She had always had what she wanted when at home, and if
Harry begrudged her the necessities of life, why, she almost believed she
had better go back to that home, for she was an only daughter and was
idolized by her parents. She sat and thought, and thought, of her wrongs
until the tears came, and then, after having a good cry, she went into
the conservatory and began picking flowers for the church decoration in
which site was to take part. There was to be a concert and recitations
and such entertainments, and the funds were to go to help the needy ones
in the parish. For there were many who needed, many men were out of work,
and their families were destitute indeed. Mabel was always ready for work
of this kind, it relieved the tedium of the days when Harry was at the
store, and then, be it known to you, although Mabel would have blushed
had she realized it herself, she liked the notices in the city personals
about the charming and philanthropic Mrs. Ray who took such a prominent
part in every good work.

Her time was her own; there were no little ones for her to care for; her
household was managed by a competent housekeeper who looked well to the
domestic arrangements; so, altogether, Mrs. Ray rather needed something
to give her an idea of usefulness. She was selfish, I am sorry to say,
but when you think that she was an only child, reared in luxury, with
everything she desired procured for her, it is no wonder that she learned
to think that what she wanted was the first thing to be considered.

Harry Ray really loved his wife, but he was bearing a heavy burden of
financial care, and then, besides, he did not possess the means that
Mabel’s father had. He would do anything, sacrifice anything for her, but
she seemed thoughtless about his sacrifices, and did not realize that
perhaps she too had a duty to perform.

She came home from decorating the church that afternoon in better
spirits, but was almost vexed when Harry assured her it would be
impossible for him to attend the Charity function with her that evening.
“Wrap yourself up well, Mabel,” Harry said thoughtfully, “and let the
coachman await you.” He looked almost wistfully at her bright young
beauty and longed for a word of sympathy and help from her, but none
came. He looked worn and worried, and a thoughtful wife would have
noticed this long before, but Mabel had not been taught to notice others
in that way.

So Harry went to his work in his office, and Mabel, dressed richly, went
to the Charity function, where she expected to sing. The evening passed
pleasantly to Mabel, for she loved a brilliant scene and the compliments
she always received.

The next day she was one of a committee to dispense the various gifts
among the poor. She rose early for her, and with several others she
visited such haunts of misery as she had never dreamed of. Poverty had
always been a rather pleasant thing in her mind where people were always
holding some sort of meetings to relieve it, and where kind hearted women
were taking chicken broth or cups of jelly to others who lay in bed; she
never really thought that perhaps it would be pleasanter to make one’s
own chicken broth or furnish one’s own jelly, or that perhaps the one
who lay in bed might do something besides just simply lie there; she did
not realize the tragedy of many of those lives where poverty binds and
sickness holds with chains invincible beyond all human aiding.

There was more wretchedness depicted in the squalid homes she visited
than she had ever dreamed of, there was not only poverty but there was
dirt, and there was suffering, and she began to wonder if there were
not other things needed by the poor besides chicken broth and jelly;
she thought soap would not be misplaced, and that clothes would find
lodgement, she was sure flowers would be welcomed by some, and she went
home with her heart really aroused from its selfish stupor. Harry did
not come home to tea, and it was so late before he did come that being
very wearied she retired, and soon fell asleep. But here, even, she was
not free, she seemed to be in the midst of a white-robed throng who went
about ministering to the needs of others, and when she spoke to them
they only said “Even Christ pleased not Himself,” and winged their way
on their errands of mercy, and then she seemed transported to the sunny
fields where flowers bloomed and birds sang their sweetest carols; there
were certain ones gathering the flowers and when she spoke to them they
said “Even Christ pleased not Himself.”

And then she was transported to the city and into the haunts of misery
and she saw a wan-faced woman going into a poor hovel with a blossom in
her hand that she had picked from where it had fallen from some fair
lady’s bouquet. She placed it carefully in a pitcher with a broken spout
and turned the fairest side of the flower toward a sick one lying upon a
pallet of straw, and when she looked a halo seemed to surround the flower
and a voice said “Even Christ pleased not Himself.” And suddenly she
seemed to be in her husband’s office, and there sat Harry, his face was
haggard, and there were tense lines about his mouth, and he seemed trying
in vain to make the accounts tally in the ledger before him, and ruin and
disaster embodied seemed looking in upon him as he worked, and finally he
laid down his pen, saying “I can do no more—if it were not for Mabel.”

Then she was in her own beautiful home and everything seemed going on
strangely; the flowers in the conservatory had withered and died because
they lived to please themselves, and so it seemed with everything in the
house; the housekeeper was keeping house to please herself, the cook was
not going to serve the dinner because it did not please her to do so, and
so it went, and she reached her room and there she found herself in ease
and luxury, taking no thought for others, and seeking only how she might
please herself; and then there seemed to be the roaring of a fire and she
saw the house and all therein consumed, but she saw the woman who had
carried the broken flower to the sick child coming to help her, and then
Harry took her in his arms, and she knew that these were safe because
they had not lived to please themselves.

After awhile she woke and hearing a step upon the stairs she slipped on
a warm dressing gown and went out softly to meet Harry. He was surprised
and there was that anxious look upon his face that she had seen in her
dream. She drew him into the parlor and seated him in an easy chair,
and then smoothed the wrinkles from his brow and begged him to tell her
of his troubles. So the husband and wife conferred together, and both
bearing the burden it grew lighter, and after a time it passed away.
Mabel seemed different thereafter, her dream was so realistic that her
very heart seemed changed, and upon its tablets were written in indelible
letters, “Even Christ pleased not Himself.” She did not care to figure
in charity functions where she would be praised of men, but she sought
out the needy and tried faithfully to aid them. Her aid was given so
unostentatiously, and with such humility and earnest sympathy, that the
poor soon learned to love her, and her flowers bloomed not in vain, for
they bloomed for the sick and sinning, for the poor and needy, and I trow
that in sowing good seeds upon earth she will reap a heavenly harvest
that will surprise her. For she has learned the sweetness of the words
“Even Christ pleased not Himself.”




CURIOUS ARCHITECTS.


There is no topic in natural history so interesting as the architecture
of birds; in the building of their nests they are exceedingly ingenious.
We may well learn a lesson from the patience, diligence and perseverance
which they display. Just as men are skilled in different mechanical
employments, so we find in the bird tribe miners, masons, carpenters,
weavers, basket-makers and tailors.

[Illustration: HUMMING BIRD’S NEST.]

The humming bird constructs its nest of the finest silky down, and of
cotton, or if these are not available, some other similar material.
The inside is lined in the most delicate manner with soft substances;
the outside is covered with moss, usually the color of the bough or
twig to which the nest is attached, thus giving it the appearance of an
excrescence. The delicacy and ingenuity of workmanship and skill could
hardly be excelled by human art.

The humming bird is the “fairy of the feathered race”—the smallest and
most beautiful—and they are found almost all over this continent. Most of
them, however, dwell in the far South, where flowers are ever in bloom,
and summer reigns all the year round. One species alone visits our chill
Northern States—the humming bird with the ruby throat. It comes to us in
July and is very shy; its stay is very short, for toward the first of
September it departs to a warmer climate.

[Illustration: WOODPECKER DRILLING A HOLE FOR A NEST.]

It is only in tropical countries that the several species of humming bird
are seen in their abundance and variety. The islands between Florida and
the main land of South America literally swarm with them. In the wild and
uncultivated parts they inhabit the magnificent forests overhung with
rare plants, whose blossoms vie in beauty with the jewel-like brilliancy
of these animate gems of the air. In the cultivated portions of the
country they abound in the gardens and seem to delight in society.

Lovely and full of nervous energy, these winged gems are constantly
in the air, darting from one object to another, and displaying their
gorgeous colors in the sunlight. When on a long journey, as during
migration, they pass through the air in long undulations, raising
themselves to a considerable height and then falling so as to form a
curve. When feeding on a flower they keep themselves poised in one
position as steadily as if suspended on a bough—making a humming sound
with the rapid motion of their wings.

In disposition these little creatures are bold and pugnacious. In
defending their nests they will attack birds five times their size and
drive them off. When angry, their motions are very violent and their
flight as swift as an arrow. Often the eye is incapable of following
them, and their shrill, piercing note alone announces their presence.

Among the most dazzling of this brilliant tribe is the bar-tailed humming
bird of Brazil. The tail is forked at the base, and consists of five
feathers, graduated one above another, at almost equal distances. Their
color is of the richest flame; the upper part of the body is golden
green, and the under part emerald.

There are more than a hundred kinds of these birds, and all are noted for
their surpassing beauty. What a beautiful conception in the author of
nature were these exquisite little creatures! It is as if the flowers had
taken wings, and life, and intelligence, to share in the sports of animal
life.

[Illustration: NESTS OF THE BOTTLE BIRD.]

The nest of the golden-crested wren, a most beautiful bird found in
England and other parts of Europe, is a fine example of weaving. It is
made of moss and lichen, and lined with feathers; it has a very small
entrance at the top and the interior of the nest is also small, bearing
no proportion to the size of the structure. The weaving of this nest is
a work of great labor and assiduity, and compared with the bulk of the
bird, it is of large dimensions.

[Illustration: NESTS OF SOCIAL WEAVERS.]

The nest is suspended from the under surface of a fir branch, thickly
clothed with foliage, by which it is almost entirely concealed and partly
protected from the rain. Thus, beneath a natural canopy, this little bird
rears her brood, whose cradle swings to and fro with every breeze. The
eggs are from seven to ten in number, and of a pale brown color.

A naturalist who watched a nest containing eight small birds with a
powerful opera glass, observed that the parent birds came to the nest
with food every two minutes, or upon an average thirty-six times in an
hour; and this continued full sixteen hours a day, which, if equally
divided between the brood, each would receive seventy-two feeds, the
whole amounting to five hundred and seventy-six!

[Illustration: NESTS OF THE SAND MARTIN.]

The woodpeckers are carpenters; they not only bore holes in trees in
search of food, but they also chisel out deep holes in which to deposit
their eggs and rear their young. They generally build their nest in May,
selecting an old apple tree in the orchard; the boring is first done by
the male, who pecks out a circular hole; as the work progresses, he is
occasionally relieved by the female. They both work with great diligence,
and as the hole deepens they carry out the chips, sometimes taking
them some distance to prevent discovery or suspicion. The nest usually
requires a week to build, and when the female is quite satisfied she
deposits her eggs, generally six in number and of a pure white color.

A bird called the grosbeak builds a nest shaped like an inverted bottle
with a long neck, through which it passes up to a snug little chamber
above. The nest is skillfully constructed of soft vegetable substances,
sewed together in a wonderful manner, and suspended from a twig of a bush.

The social weaver is found in the south of Africa. Hundreds of these
birds, in one community, join to form a structure of interwoven grass
containing various apartments, all covered by a sloping roof impenetrable
to the heaviest rain, and increased year after year as the population of
the little community may require.

A traveler, returned from a journey through South Africa, writes: “A
tree with an enormous nest of these birds was quite near where our party
camped for the night. I dispatched a few men with a wagon to bring it to
the camp that I might open the hive and examine the nest in its minutest
parts. When it arrived I cut it to pieces with a hatchet, and saw that
the chief portion of the structure consisted of grass, without any
mixture, but so compact and firmly woven together as to be impenetrable
to the rain. This is a canopy under which each bird builds its particular
nest; the canopy projects a little, which serves to let the water run off
when it rains. The nest contained three hundred and twenty nests, and it
was calculated that the number of birds would exceed six hundred in this
one nest alone.”

The bottle-nested sparrow is a basket maker; it is found in India and
is a very intelligent bird. It resembles our native sparrow in some
particulars, but its color is brown and yellow. It associates in large
communities and builds its nests on palm trees. It is formed in a very
ingenious way, by long grasses woven together into the shape of a bottle,
and it is then suspended at the extremity of a branch, in order to secure
the eggs and young birds from numerous enemies, such as serpents, monkeys
and other animals which infest that part of the world.

These nests excel in the neatness and delicacy of their workmanship.
They contain several apartments intended for different purposes; in one
the female deposits her eggs; in another is stored the food which the
male gathers for his mate during her maternal duties, and a third is the
sleeping apartment for the male bird.

The sand martin is a most curious member of the swallow tribe. It appears
in the spring a week or two before the common swallow, and it is fond of
skimming swiftly over the surface of the water. This bird makes a hole
in a sand bank, sometimes two feet deep, at the extremity of which it
constructs a loose nest of fine grass and feathers, in which it rears its
young brood. The beak of the sand martin is like a sharp little awl, very
hard, and tapering, suddenly to a point.

The tailor bird is not the least interesting of the bird family; it has a
curious bill which it uses like a needle, and it forms its nest by sewing
the materials together instead of weaving.

[Illustration: NEST OF TAILOR BIRD.]

“The tailor bird,” says Darwin, “will not build its nest to the extremity
of a tender twig, but makes one more advance to safety by fixing it to
the leaf itself. It picks up a dead leaf and sews it to the side of a
living one, its slender bill serving as a needle, and its thread some
fine fibers; the lining consists of feathers, gossamer and down; its eggs
are white; the color of the bird light yellow; its length three inches;
its weight three-sixteenths of an ounce; so that the materials of the
nest and the weight of the bird are not likely to draw down a habitation
so slightly suspended.”

The different methods of nest building evidently result from the
peculiarities of the birds themselves combined with their surroundings.
Will these styles of architecture be changed or further developed?

                                                             HENRY COYLE.




VICK’S FLOWERS.


    What radiance do I see?
      What color-wave outflows,
    Making the wilderness rejoice
      And blossom like the rose?

    From sea to sea it pours,
      From east to western strands,
    Softening the stern Atlantic shores,
      Brightening Pacific sands.

    The South-land grows more sweet;
      By broad blue Northern lakes,
    Fair as auroral flushes fleet
      The fragrant flower-tide breaks.

    Our fertile vales make room
      For this benignant grace;
    The prairie’s wealth of native bloom
      Gladly to this gives place.

    O, lovely enterprise,
      Refining where it goes,
    Making the wilderness rejoice
      And blossom as the rose!

                      —VIRGINIA WESTWOOD.

       *       *       *       *       *

“Only the Scars Remain,”

[Illustration]

Says HENRY HUDSON, of the James Smith Woolen Machinery Co., Philadelphia,
Pa., who certifies as follows:

“Among the many testimonials which I see in regard to certain medicines
performing cures, cleansing the blood, etc., none impress me more than
=my own case=. Twenty years ago, at the age of 18 years, I had swellings
come on my legs, which broke and became =running sores=. Our family
physician could do me no good, and it was feared that the bones would be
affected. At last, my good old

Mother urged me

to try =Ayer’s= Sarsaparilla. I took three bottles, the sores healed, and
I have not been troubled since. =Only the Scars remain, and the memory
of the past, to remind me of the good Ayer’s Sarsaparilla has done me.=
I now weigh two hundred and twenty pounds, and am in the best of health.
I have been on the road for the past twelve years, have noticed =Ayer’s=
Sarsaparilla advertised in all parts of the United States, and always
take pleasure in telling what good it did for me.”

Ayer’s Sarsaparilla

Prepared by Dr. J. C. Ayer & Co., Lowell, Mass.

Cures others, will cure you.




LINES TO A SKUNK CABBAGE.


    Oh, life grotesque! How, whence did spring
    The thought that gave thee blossoming?
    How comes thy strange offensive bloom
    Near knolls that give sweet violets room?
    Sweet violets, which fill the air
    With perfumed incense of a prayer
    That, floating to the world above
    Calls blessings from the soul of Love.
    But thou, mephitic bloom! thou hast
    A thought in thee of ages past,
    When songs of love were all unknown,
    Ere earth had into beauty grown,
    Ere rippling brook and soughing pine
    Had turned her prose hills into rhyme;
    When all was dark, and cold, and bare,
    Thou hadst, perhaps, a mission there;
    And that is why, ’neath spring-time snows
    Thy curious spathe so early grows.
    Hast thou no mission now, strange flower,
    Happier to make spring’s early hour?
    Hark! from thy close-wrapped heart doth come
    The working bee’s glad, soundful hum,
    Where loads of pollen he doth find
    His waxen honey cells to bind.
    So, thou hast place in fields of use,
    And vain are now words of abuse—
    Giving the best thy heart doth hold
    To help the workers of the world.
    And giving thus, with patient grace,
    Doth baser qualities efface,
    And in a better, higher sphere
    Thine inner beauty doth appear,
    And thy developed soul shall be
    Violet-sweet eternally.

                                     —BETH MAX.

These lines were suggested by a spathe of the skunk cabbage sent me by
my brother, W. S. Ripley, of Wakefield, Mass., who mentioned in his
letter to me when the specimen was sent that he stopped “to watch the
bees go in at the aperture on one side of the spathe, and listened to
their loud humming inside, as they laid on their load of pollen.” In
Thoreau’s “Early Spring in Massachusetts,” page 172, in writing of this
plant he says: “All along under that bank I heard the hum of honey bees
in the air, attracted by this flower. Especially the hum of one within a
spathe sounds deep and loud.”




THE NEW FRENCH CANNAS.


I do not know of any class of plants that have attracted so much
attention or have been so much admired during the past season as the new
large flowering French cannas. And for effectiveness on lawns in large
beds or masses, or as single specimens in the mixed border, nothing can
be more tropical and impressive. They are really plants for everybody as
they are entirely free from insect pests, and require but little care
and attention to grow them to perfection. They succeed well in all kinds
of weather, wet or dry, and are not injured in the least by the severe
storms of wind and rain that we so often experience during the summer
season.

They bloom without intermission from June until they are destroyed by
frost; the spikes of large flowers somewhat resemble gladiolus but are
really more effective and showy as their brilliant colors show so grandly
against their tropical foliage. Most, if not all, of the varieties grow
on an average about three feet in height, and the flowers range in color
from deep crimson to pure yellow, including all the intermediate shades,
many being so beautifully marked that they are frequently compared to
orchid flowers.

To grow these cannas to perfection as well as to enable them to properly
develop themselves, they should be given a very deep heavily enriched
soil, and as soon as hot, dry weather sets in mulched to the depth of
at least two inches with good stable manure, and if the opportunity
offers, water copiously during seasons of drought. With this treatment a
single tuber will make a clump three or four feet in diameter in a single
season; this will give one some idea of the immense amount of foliage and
flowers a single specimen will produce.

The plants should not be planted outside until the weather becomes warm
and settled, which in this vicinity is about the tenth of May, and as
soon as the foliage has been destroyed by the frost it should be cut off,
and the tubers dug and stored underneath the greenhouse stage, or in some
other situation, where a temperature of 55° is maintained, until the time
arrives for planting them outside again.

Or the plants can be lifted on the approach of cold weather, divided,
potted up, and grown on for decorative purposes in either the greenhouse
or window garden. This is a very safe way to winter over the large
flowering cannas or any other variety of which one’s stock is limited.

When grown as pot plants for winter decoration the cannas should be given
a compost consisting of two-thirds turfy loam, one-third well decayed
manure and a good sprinkling of bone dust, mix well and use the compost
rough. The plants should be given as light and sunny a situation as
possible and a temperature of 55° to 60°. They should also be freely
watered both overhead and at the roots, and as soon as the pots become
well filled with roots a little liquid ammonia can be given occasionally
or else they must be shifted into larger pots.

Propagation is effected by a careful division of the clumps, and where
the plants are to be kept in a state of rest the operation should be
performed when they are being planted out in May. In dividing leave two
or three eyes or shoots to each plant.

Of the many varieties now listed in catalogues the following are the most
desirable and distinct:

Alphonse Bouvier is the grandest deep red variety known, both truss and
flowers being very large, and the plant makes a most luxuriant growth of
deep red foliage. In color the flowers are of a rich velvety red.

Capt. P. de Suzzini has handsome light green foliage and is the most
beautiful of all the spotted varieties. Its flowers are of a rich shade
of canary yellow beautifully spotted and dashed with red.

Francois Crozy has bright green foliage and very large flowers which are
of a bright orange bordered with a narrow edge of gold—a very rare and
desirable color in cannas.

Madame Crozy grows about three and a half feet in height and has broad
bright green foliage. The flowers, which are produced in massive spikes,
are of a bright crimson scarlet beautifully bordered with gold. The plant
commences to bloom when about one foot in height.

Nellie Bowden, in all respects this is identical with Madame Crozy except
in the color of its flowers which are of a rich golden yellow. One of the
most distinct and beautiful of cannas.

Paul Marquant has dark green foliage and very large handsome flowers of a
bright salmon scarlet. A very showy variety.

Star of 1891 is so well and favorably known as to require no description.
It is the best of all for pot culture, as it is of dwarf growth and very
free-flowering. The flowers are of a bright orange scarlet occasionally
edged with yellow.

_Floral Park, N. Y._

                                                        CHAS. E. PARNELL.




THE DIFFERENCE.


It makes all the difference between nice thrifty plants or scraggly
looking ones whether we read, mark, learn, and inwardly digest a floral
magazine. In walking on the street, the appearance of the windows or
front yards tells you whether the postman leaves a floral weekly or
monthly. Six weeks ago I saw a row of empty pots right in the sun, and
often an old man was poking up the soil with his penknife to see if his
bulbs had started. You see he didn’t read up about hyacinths, but potted
them and put them right in the sun. I can imagine his saying to his wife,
“It’s money thrown away to buy bulbs; they probably are too old to grow
and I’ve been cheated.” So the poor seedsman gets the blame, and not his
own ignorance. Here is a window with leggy looking geraniums in it, just
a few leaves on top of the long stems. Now a little reading in a floral
magazine would have shown her, after blooming all summer, the place for
them is the cellar. Ah! here is a window that shows intelligence. The
hyacinths and jonquils are showing their buds, moved to the window from
the dark corners where they have been for weeks forming vigorous roots.
Here are primroses in bloom, and oxalis, and a scarlet nasturtium makes
the room bright on a cloudy day, and in a corner I can see the Palm
Latania. She takes the magazines and knows what are good winter plants
for amateurs.

In summer one can pick out the magazine lawns and gardens. Here is one
where the man has two shapely maple trees in front, and has pruned his
“Jac” rose so that it is loaded with blossoms, and in a circular bed he
has put a caladium in the center, and this shows off the gladiolus in
every shade around it. But the next front yard is enough to set one’s
teeth on edge. Actually, here is a large square bed with a tall candidum
lily in each corner and, inside, petunias, zinnias, asters and marigolds
in one blaze of color. The whole effect is like a crazy quilt thrown
over an old fashioned four-posted bedstead. One sees the roses eaten of
worms and bugs, or planted by the sunflowers and looking ashamed at their
surroundings; whereas the magazines tell us again and again that roses
need to be watched continually and sprayed to keep off the insects, and
to plant by themselves. Now for the moral. Let us all show, and lend our
florals, and urge the people to subscribe.

                                                              ANNA LYMAN.

       *       *       *       *       *

“WORTH A GUINEA A BOX.”

BEECHAM’S PILLS CURE SICK HEADACHE, DISORDERED LIVER, etc.

They Act Like Magic on the Vital Organs, Regulating the Secretions,
restoring long lost Complexion, bringing back the Keen Edge of Appetite,
and arousing with the =ROSEBUD OF HEALTH= the whole physical energy of
the human frame. These Facts are admitted by thousands, in all classes
of Society. Largest Sale in the World.

Covered with a Tasteless & Soluble Coating.

Of all druggists. Price =25= cents a Box. New York Depot, 365 Canal St.




A COTTAGE LOT.


When a tradesman can indulge in a suburban home or a summer cottage
it will often happen that he will desire to keep a family horse. If
he doesn’t want a horse he will often want a cow or chickens. In the
accompanying sketch A is a site provided for one or other of these
animals, and it is designedly given a prominent position that its
architecture may receive treatment in consonance with that of the
residence, that it may be in unison with the surroundings, and that it
may supplant the useless and ugly pavilions frequently seen.

The approach to the house is direct and convenient for all points, unless
the architect is perverse enough to put the coal cellar on the opposite
side.

The boundary hedge is of Norway spruce with room enough to grow and room
enough to get between it and the fence to clip it. I saw a hedge on paper
recently—between two groups of shrubbery—which was not allowed room to
stand on end.

There is a small vegetable garden, 13, with a border around it for
blackberries, currants, raspberries, strawberries and such like, and at
the end, 14, either a few fruit trees or flowering shrubs. The porches,
both back and front, are but a single step above the roadway. The rooms
may or may not be another step above them, depending somewhat upon the
character of the subsoil, etc. I have not arranged any special drying
ground, for cedar poles may be set up in the center of any of the round
beds, 1 to 8, and clothed with Japanese ivy, Euonymus radicans, climbing
hydrangeas and so on, and have wires between them.

Now these beds may be further filled with either bedding plants or select
herbaceous plants. I will assume that it is a summer cottage, and I would
then plant the ground as follows, which would result in a very different
how d’ye do from that usually seen in such places: 1, Begonia Evansiana;
2, Funkia grandiflora; 3, Echinacea purpurea; 4, Aconitum Napellus
variegata; 5, Lobelia cardinalis; 6, Sedum Sieboldii; 7, Veronica
longifolia subsessilis; 8, six distinct varieties of Phlox paniculata.
These beds may be varied greatly, but nothing of unreliable character
should ever be planted in them. Number 1, for instance, might have a tub
of nelumbium in place of the begonia, not that it is greatly better, but
for variety and fancy.

Numbers 9, 9, 9, are shrubbery groups composed of the following
summer-flowering material, disposed in such manner that all sides may
be seen, and mowed around, and giving the longest possible margins
for the space occupied. There are but few trees to bloom after July,
they are chiefly Rhus semialata Osbeckii and R. glabra; Dimorphanthus
Mandschuricus; Koelreuteria paniculata and Clerodendron trichotomum. None
of them are large. Of shrubs there are a number, and it is strange that
they are so seldom used effectively. Garden shrubbery looks more devoid
of color in August here than English shrubbery in midwinter. This should
not be with a list such as the following to draw from and utilize. Just
fancy what we have—and the great artists we have—and tell me if it should
be.

There are the altheas, lots of them; Buddleia Lindleyana; Calluna
vulgaris; Clethras in variety; Callicarpa purpurea; _x_ Clematis in
variety; Clerodendron viscosum; Desmodiums; Dabœcia polifolia; Daphne
cneorum; Erica vagans; Euonymus Sieboldianus; Hydrangea Hortensia
varieties; Hydrangea paniculata grandiflora; Hypericum in varieties;
Hibiscus roseus, etc.; Indigofera Dosua; Kerria Japonica; Lespedeza
bicolor; Leycesteria formosa; Lagerstrœmia Indica; _x_ Lonicera Halleana;
_x_ Periploca græca; Polygonum cuspidatum; Potentilla fruticosa; Rubus
odoratus; Rhodotypus Kerrioides; Rhus copallina; Rosa rugosa; R.
Wichuriana, and several hybrids; Spiræa salicifolia, S. tomentosa, S.
Douglassii, and S. Bumalda if it is pruned after flowering in spring;
Tamarix Chinensis; _x_ Tecoma radicans; _x_ Tecoma grandiflora; Vitex
agnus-castus; Vitex Negundo incisa, and a large number of sub-frutescent
plants of large size, which may be substituted for such of the shrubs as
are tender north of Philadelphia. Numbers 10 and 11 are prepared borders
which may well be planted with Hydrangeas Hortensia, Thomas Hogg, etc.,
and interspersed with the pink and white varieties of Lilium speciosum.
Numbers 12, 12 are plants of Sciadopitys verticillata.

[Illustration: PLAN OF GROUNDS.]

Climbers are marked x. South of Philadelphia Bignonia capreolata,
Magnolia grandiflora and evergreen roses may be grown on walls.

_Trenton, N. J._

                                                        JAMES MACPHERSON.




ROSE LEAVES.


My rose bushes are almost as much admired for their beautiful foliage as
for their lovely roses. “I never saw such handsome leaves, why they look
exactly like wax.” This is an exclamation I am growing quite accustomed
to hear from friends, and it is really true; but I think any one who
grows roses as house plants may have just as handsome foliage if the
proper care is taken of the plants. Once or twice every week (just as
is most convenient) I wash every leaf with clean, weak soapsuds, under
side as well as upper side. With the small-leaved Polyanthas it is too
tiresome to wash each leaflet individually, but the foliage can be
sprayed well, and then very carefully and gently a branch of leaves may
be wiped at once, and in this manner one can go over quite a number of
plants in half an hour. The leaves may be left without wiping, of course,
but the foliage is apt to be marred unless it is done, as the soapsuds
dries on the leaves in white, unsightly spots. Roses treated in this way
will very rarely be troubled with pests of any kind, and such rich waxen
green foliage as they will possess is more beautiful than many flowers.

It is something quite remarkable here, where the thermometer falls to
40° and 50° below zero, to see roses blooming outside of a conservatory,
But mine have been doing beautifully in the bay window all winter, and
small as the plants are they have flowered wonderfully well. At night
the plants are moved away from the window to a place where they are
secure from frost Queen’s Scarlet seems to make a special effort to
surpass itself each time some other rose comes into bloom, and every
rose it produces is, I think, more beautiful than its predecessor. It is
in every way one of the loveliest of roses, and although lacking in the
rich fragrance of many others, it yet possesses a delicate sweetness of
its own. The first time that American Beauty bloomed for me it bore two
exquisite roses, and the little bush was barely eight inches high, one
of the shoots which produced a flower being only four inches out of the
soil, and the rich, exquisite sweetness of these large, deep pink roses
is surely unsurpassed by any other.

Sometimes when the buds seem very slow about unfolding I take a cup
of lukewarm water and gently bending each bud give it a few minutes
immersion. This certainly hastens their development and in no way injures
them. If I could only have one rose Queen’s Scarlet would be my choice;
if I could have others American Beauty would certainly be the next one.

                                                       MRS. S. H. SNIDER.

       *       *       *       *       *

CARE OF SEEDS.—The smaller the seeds the less covering required. Fine
seeds may be scattered on the moist soil, or at most have a sprinkling of
sand over them.

       *       *       *       *       *

PAYSON’S INDELIBLE INK

[Illustration]

Has a Record of Half a Century.

☞ For Marking Personal and Family Linen.

☞ For Marking Clothing of any Fabric.

It has been in constant and regular use in

    U. S. Gov’t Hospital, Washington, D. C., 50 years.
    U. S. Hotel, Boston, 40 years.
    Miss. State Lunatic Hospital, Jackson, Miss., 33 years.
    Fifth Avenue Hotel, New York, 31 years.

Received HIGHEST AWARD at WORLD’S FAIR, 1893.

Sample bottle mailed on receipt of 25 cts. if you cannot obtain it at
druggists or stationers.

A. L. WILLISTON, Northampton, Mass.




Letter Box.

In this department we shall be pleased to answer any questions relating
to Flowers, Vegetables and Plants, or to publish the experiences of our
readers. JAMES VICK.


Lady Washington and Other Plants.

    I see by your September Magazine that you want the experience
    of anyone that has had good success with Lady Washington
    geraniums. I had good success with mine. I used as a fertilizer
    ground oil cake worked into the soil. It was a year-old plant
    and had five bunches of bloom with five pansy-like flowers in
    each bloom. They only bloom once a year. I also used the oil
    cake on an ivy-leaved geranium and its growth was beyond my
    expectations, for in a year’s time it was eighteen feet long.
    All plants I have used it on have done exceedingly well.

                                                         MRS. N. G.

    _Lane, Kansas._


Roses in Kansas.

    I would like to know what manure that the farm can furnish to
    use for the bed of Monthly roses, also, must they be pruned or
    cut back the first year, and what treatment must I give them
    in the winter here in Kansas? Must I cut off all branches and
    cover the roots or wrap the branches?

                                                            MRS. M.

Dig into the bed every spring a heavy dressing of well rotted stable
manure. Protect the plants in winter with a covering of leaves or
branches of evergreens, prune in spring and when needed at other times,
so as to get a good growth of new wood.


Ixia—Spider Lily.

    Will you please tell me through your Magazine how to pronounce
    ixias.

    Also, how to treat the spider lily.

                                                           A. E. M.

    _Casstown, Ohio._

The division of the word as here given, ix-i-a, sufficiently indicates
its pronunciation.

The spider lilies, or Pancratiums, are plants growing naturally in
marshes or low moist grounds and require plenty of water in their growing
and blooming stage—afterwards give less water favoring a season of
comparative rest, but do not allow to go wholly dry.


Plants About a Fish Pond.

    I have a nice fish pond that till recently has been outside of
    my yard, but finding that the cattle would spoil the banks I
    am now taking it into my yard enclosure and wish to make it an
    ornament, which it really is. What kinds of plants are suitable
    to plant in the water and around it that would make it showy? I
    have now the Egyptian lotus growing in it.

                                                           W. C. L.

    _Pennsville, Pa._

One great point in making the planting should be to secure plants which
are hardy, and another to select those appropriate to the situation.
Both of these ends can be secured by using the water and bog plants
which flourish in that locality. These might be named, but that would
not assist in securing them. The practical way is to look up a number of
ponds and streams and visit them every month during spring and summer,
and see how many interesting plants may be found. Mark their positions,
and in autumn visit the places again and remove such as are wanted and
plant them in similar situations about the pond. Willows of different
kinds and black ash and poplars and alder trees can furnish shade, and
several kinds of shrubs can be used to ornament the banks.


Osage Orange Hedge.

    Please send instructions for raising Osage orange hedge.

                                                           B. B. R.

    _Spangle, Wash._

The Osage orange is a native of Texas, and consequently needs warm
weather to make its growth. The seed should be planted at the time
of corn planting in northern localities. A month previous to sowing
place the seed in a dish of water and let it remain covered with water
until ready to sow. If kept in water the length of time stated it will
germinate in ten or fifteen days after planting. If kept dry and planted
in that condition it will start only after six or eight weeks, and very
unevenly. When planting time arrives drain off the water and mix the seed
with dry sand and sow it thinly in drills in good soil. When the plants
are up hoe them and keep them clean or work them with a cultivator, if
on a sufficiently large scale. The first season’s growth should make
them large enough to set in a hedge. They can remain standing in the
seed-bed until spring and then be lifted early to be planted. Cut back
the tops and the roots so that each shall be about five inches in length.
The ground where the hedge is to stand should be well prepared by deep
plowing, and dragging fine and smooth. If plowed up the year before and
cultivated with some cleaning crop such as potatoes or carrots it will
be all the better fitted. Having stretched a line for the course of the
hedge the plants can be dibbled in along it, at a distance of six inches
apart, or they can be set in with a spade; another way is to open a
trench about six inches deep along the line and set the plants in it,
one person placing the plants while another fills in a spadeful of soil
against each one; then the soil is firmed with the foot against each
plant and afterwards the trench filled. The after culture for the first
year is to hoe and keep the ground clean. The spring of the following
year before growth starts cut the plants down to within six inches of the
old stock. The following year do the same; an annual rise of six inches
is sufficient. At the second year’s pruning and afterwards cut the side
shoots so that those at the base shall be longest, giving the hedge a
broad base narrowing to a line at the top.


Vase in Cemetery.

    I have a large reservoir vase twenty-five inches in diameter
    for the cemetery. Last summer I had it arranged by one of our
    home florists and it did not do nicely at all and was not in
    the least satisfactory. Will you please advise me what plants
    to use in it this summer? I thought I would put around the edge
    to droop, ivy geraniums, double petunias and nasturtiums and
    anything else you may suggest. I have a pink ivy geranium and
    would like a white one, and thought I would like the petunias
    of some different colors, perhaps one variegated and some
    other. The nasturtiums I shall raise from seed, and I suppose
    I might use a little sweet alyssum and lobelia. What would you
    recommend for the center plants? Of course I know it is too
    early to start it yet, but I want it all settled so that I can
    get it ready as early as possible.

                                                           K. A. R.

    _Waverly, N. Y._

A vase of plants is not adapted to a cemetery unless there is a gardener
in charge of the grounds and who will give the necessary daily care.
A garden vase of growing plants needs daily attention in watering
and through the hottest weather should be supplied twice a day. It
is rare that a cemetery has a gardener in attendance. We, therefore,
would discourage the use of vases in cemeteries for they are anything
but ornamental unless they have constant care. It is far better to
set directly in the ground whatever flowering or ornamental plants
one chooses to have. There they will thrive with less attention than
elsewhere. Of course if they can have the needed care the vases can be
filled with such plants as are usually employed for this purpose, and,
no doubt, the vase which our inquirer complains of was well filled. It
was unsatisfactory, and probably would be so again another season. The
best place for the vase is on the lawn near the dwelling. But if it is to
be used in the cemetery then we should try to make the best of it, and
select such plants as will do fairly well with the occasional attendance
they will get, together with the rain which falls upon them from the
clouds.

Such a selection of plants is difficult to make. For a center plant
perhaps a small sized American aloe would be as appropriate and appear
as well as any that might be tried. Possibly a small India rubber plant
might be another good one. For filling in the list is a restricted one.
The portulaca would be reliable; the ageratum and the petunia would do
fairly well, and the Thunbergia and oxalis might be expected to hold
their own. The othonna would no doubt do well set around the edge.
Perhaps the green and the variegated vinca would suffer meekly, if it
was demanded of them, and try to show how brave they are. We fear the
nasturtium and geraniums and alyssum and lobelia would scarcely hold
their own. In some seasons which we have known in this region, when
showers have been frequent all through the summer, a vase of such plants
as are ordinarily used would do well, but such seasons are rare. Usually
the plants will suffer for lack of water.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

The Best Food For Children?

is worthy every parent’s study; not only what they can eat, but what
gives the most nourishment. No children are better, and most are worse,
for eating lard-cooked food. If, however, their food is prepared with the
healthful new vegetable shortening,

COTTOLENE

instead of lard, they can eat freely of the best food without danger
to the digestive organs. You can easily verify this by a fair trial of
Cottolene.

Sold in 3 and 5 lb. pails by all grocers.

Made only by The N. K. Fairbank Company,

Chicago, Boston, New York, St. Louis, Montreal, Philadelphia, San
Francisco.


Carnations in the House.

    Every year I get a number of carnation plants and I take the
    best of care of them, as good as I know how. At first they look
    well, but in a short time they begin to turn yellow at the top
    and the yellow keeps going down until it gets to the bottom
    and they are dead. Other plants do well with me. What is the
    trouble?

                                                      MRS. F. P. W.

    _Highlandlake, Colo._

Carnations want a cool, moist air, and cannot adapt themselves to the
high temperature and dry air of living rooms heated by coal in stoves
or furnaces. To raise the plants one should have a conservatory off the
living room, or at least an inclosed bay window.


Madeira Vine.

    Will you kindly inform me through your “Letter Box” how to
    treat a Madeira vine so it will produce blossoms? I have a vine
    four years old, has never done very well until this winter, but
    the foliage is beautiful and it seems strange that it does not
    blossom. I have got it in a tin wash basin hung with strings
    in the window, the sun shines on it from early in the morning
    until three o’clock in the afternoon. It is trained out each
    side of basin with strings and measures three feet across, and
    hangs about one foot from the glass. I have trained it back and
    forth from the basin to the curtain and it has locked itself
    through the lace of the curtain. I want to know what I shall do
    with it in the spring. I shall have to take down the curtain,
    and will it injure the vine to cut it? I have been told that I
    ought to clip this winter’s growth in the spring. I should like
    to know why it does not blossom. Please let me know and confer
    a favor.

                                                 A CONSTANT READER.

    _Baldwinsville, N. Y._

The Madeira vine is so easily raised it is not necessary to be
particularly careful of a plant which has already fulfilled its mission.
The atmospheric and root conditions under house culture are not favorable
to the blooming of this plant. If the tubers are placed in a rich, warm
soil early in spring the plant will make a great growth and bloom in
autumn. When the particular plant in question is to be moved, in the
spring, a portion of its top growth can be cut away and then the whole
plant slipped out of the pan into the open ground outside.

       *       *       *       *       *

A FARM OF FOWLS.

In the whole West there’s not to be found another such collection of
fancy poultry as that of C. C. Shoemaker, Freeport, Ill. He invites
correspondence or a visit. It is said that Mr. Shoemaker’s business has
trebled itself every year since he began business.

       *       *       *       *       *

How He Got the Best of Hard Times.

Mrs. Jones wanted an Organ and as Mr. Jones was one of those good
husbands he wanted to please his wife, but in this case with the hard
times staring him in the face he did not see how he could spare the
money. Anyway he thought he would see what he could do with the dealers
and agents in his neighboring town, but after looking over their stock
he found the cheapest Organ he could get would cost him $65.00, and it
didn’t amount to much at that.

This was more than Mr. Jones could afford and he told his wife so.
Although a great disappointment to them both, they decided they would
have to give up the idea.

A few days after this, Mr. Jones in looking over Vick’s Magazine saw the
advertisement of the “Beethoven Piano and Organ Co.,” of Washington, N.
J., stating that they sold a first-class Organ for only $27.50, with
stool and book. He sent for their catalogue which they send free to all
who write.

Mr. Jones now has the organ in his parlor, for which he paid $27.50, and
says it is even better than the agents offered him at $65.00.

He beat the hard times by purchasing direct from the factory, thus saving
the profits of the dealers and agents.

The Company offers the same good bargains on Pianos.


Mildew on Cucumber Vines.

    Is there anything that will kill mildew on cucumber vines in a
    forcing house without injuring the vines?

                                                           A. L. B.

Try sulphide of potash. Dissolve one ounce in four gallons of water and
syringe the affected plants with it. It will probably destroy the mildew
and not injure the plants.


Moles.

    Can you tell me in your “Letter Box” how to get rid of moles?
    We are very much annoyed by them and find a trap perfectly
    worthless.

                                                           M. H. C.

    _Fort Riley, Kans._

The trap is the best known means of destroying moles, but of course it
requires vigilance and patience and perseverance in its use, without
these the trap is ineffective. Those who have tried poisoned corn say
that it will effectually rid a place of moles. Soak the kernels in
arsenic water and place them in the runways. Perhaps some of our readers
may have some experience to state on this subject.


Pine Apple Air Plant.

Several inquiries have been received about the treatment of this plant.
Those who are offering it in the trade advise that the roots be wrapped
in moss and that the plant be wired upon a piece of bark or wood, that
it be placed in the window, and frequently showered or sprayed. We have
had no experience with it. The plant is a native of a hot and humid
climate and it is somewhat doubtful that it will generally succeed in
window culture. Unless the window is a bay, and enclosed with glass on
the side of the room which it is off, and, moreover, well heated, it will
probably in most cases prove a failure. Its family relationship is with
the Spanish gray moss, and the pine apple.


Phyllocactus latifrons.

    Your answers to correspondents in the “Letter Box” are so
    helpful that I am led to ask for hints as to the treatment of
    the night-blooming phyllocactus. I have one that blossomed
    three or four times, but only a single flower at a time. It
    seems to spend its strength in sending out long, round stems
    two or three feet in length. I cut off one of these a few weeks
    ago and it soon started again at the same spot and is now
    three feet long. Ought these stems to be cut, and is there any
    special treatment which will secure blossoms? An answer in your
    interesting Magazine will much oblige

                                                      MRS. D. F. G.

    _Norwich, Conn._

It is not advisable to remove the shoots as mentioned, a large and well
branched plant is desirable, and in that condition it should be capable
of producing more flowers. Give a rich soil with a mixture of sand, and
water moderately. Let it have a position where it will have the sun a
portion of the day.


Mammoth Freesias.

    In reply to Mrs. J. F. S., in the January Magazine, concerning
    mammoth freesias, I will say I have had them two years. I do
    not find the bulb any larger than the ordinary variety but they
    produce more flowers—I had from three to five clusters from
    each bulb; they bloom about two weeks earlier and the flowers
    are a little larger than the others. I like to grow them with
    the others to have a succession of bloom. I have never failed
    with freesias, and think Mrs. J. F. S. has made some mistake
    in their treatment. Plant an inch deep in a rich soil, place
    them in the dark until they have sprouted, then place next the
    glass in a south or east window. Keep the pots in deep saucers
    and fill the latter with _hot_ water every morning. One great
    secret is to keep their feet warm. Many people do not give them
    enough water, they require a great deal. If any remains in the
    saucer from the day before throw it out and give fresh. If
    water is poured on the soil it should always be warmer than the
    air. In this way I have an abundance of large perfect flowers,
    the clusters sometimes remaining perfect for three weeks. As
    a last word, have good drainage and give plenty of heat and
    water. I think your Magazine is invaluable.

                                                      MRS. C. H. J.

    _Crestline, Ohio._

       *       *       *       *       *

THE SWINE AND THE FLOWER.

    I shrank to meet a mud-encrusted swine,
      And then he seemed to grunt in accents rude,
    “Huh! Be not proud, for in this fat of mine,
      Behold the source of richness for your food!”

    I fled, and saw a field that seemed, at first,
      One giant mass of roses pure and white,
    With dewy buds ’mid dark green foliage nursed,
      And, as I lingered o’er this lovely sight,
    The summer breeze, that cooled that southern scene,
      Whispered, “Behold the source of Cottolene!”

                                        —_M. E. Wilmer._


Wormy Raspberries—Violets—Storing Cauliflower.

    Can you tell us how to prevent having wormy raspberries? For
    the last two years ours have been worthless from being wormy.

    I want to have a bed of violets. Must I use roots or can I get
    seeds?

    How can cauliflower be put away for the winter? We cut ours
    from the stump, turned the leaves over the heads and packed
    them closely together, but some of them have spoiled.

                                                      MRS. R. P. F.

    _Beaver Dam, Wis._

We do not know what insect it is whose larva infests raspberries. If any
of our readers can supply the information we trust they will give it.

Purchase the roots of violets, it is not practicable to raise them from
seeds.

Cauliflower, like the strawberry, is good enough to be eaten when it is
ready. It does not improve by keeping. The heads may be kept in a cool
cellar for a considerable time if they are pulled up with some soil
adhering to the roots, and set in rows in the cellar with the roots
covered with soil. Tie the leaves together or turn them down over the
heads.

       *       *       *       *       *

=THE BROADWAY CENTRAL HOTEL=, New York, which has undergone a thorough
rebuilding, is now open to the public.

This is altogether the largest hotel property in New York, and, with the
present improvements, will have a valuation of nearly two millions of
dollars and accommodate over one thousand persons.

Mr. Haynes, the new lessee, is making it a great popular house for
families and business men, at popular rates, for which the location is
admirably adapted. The new cable-cars on Broadway reach every fashionable
store, theater and attraction of the city, and transfer with all
cross-town lines, reaching every station, dock and ferry in town.

       *       *       *       *       *

_Every reason why it should_

FIT

[Illustration]

For Dr. Warner’s Coraline Corsets are made in 25 styles—modelled to fit
every variety of form.

Wear the one that fits

YOU




[Illustration: Vick’s Illustrated Monthly Magazine.

Devoted to the profitable culture of flowers and vegetables.]

ROCHESTER, N. Y., MARCH, 1894.

_Entered in the Post Office at Rochester as “second-class” matter._


_=Vick’s Monthly Magazine= is published at the following rates, either
for old or new subscribers. These rates include postage:_

_One copy one year, in advance, Fifty Cents._

_One copy twenty-seven months (two and one-fourth years), full payment in
advance, One Dollar._

_A Club of Five or more copies, sent at one time, at 40 cents each,
without premiums. Neighbors can join in this plan._

_=Free Copies.=—One free copy additional will be allowed to each club of
ten (in addition to all other premiums and offers), if spoken of at the
time the club is sent._

_All contributions and subscriptions should be sent to Vick Publishing
Co., at Rochester, N. Y._


_ADVERTISING RATES._

_$1.25 per agate line per month; $1.18 for 3 months, or 200 lines; $1.12
for six months, or 400 lines; $1.06 or 9 months, or 600 lines; $1.00 for
1 year, or 1000 lines. =One line extra charged for less than five.=_

☞ _All communications in regard to advertising to Vick Publishing Co.,
New York office, 38 Times Building, H. P. Hubbard, Manager._

_Average monthly circulation 1893_, =200,000=.


SITUATIONS FREE OF CHARGE.

We are constantly receiving applications of people who desire gardeners
and florists, and we have decided that hereafter we will publish
advertisements of those who desire situations free of charge. Write
copy plain and send by the first of the month for insertion in the next
month’s Magazine.




A YELLOW-FLOWERED CALLA.


A visit a short time since to the famous greenhouses of our townsman,
Wm. S. Kimball, where orchids mostly abound, favored us with a view of
the rare yellow-flowered calla, Richardia Elliottii. Although we had
carefully read the description of this plant we found it really more
beautiful than the image we had formed of it. The plant in appearance
is much like that of the common calla, Richardia Africana, except that
the leaves are spotted all over with white spots. The flower spathe is
of good size and form, and of a pure canary yellow color. It will prove
to be a grand companion to the common calla and is destined to be widely
cultivated. At present the plants are very scarce and expensive and it
will be some time before they can be very freely offered.




OUR NATIVE GRAPE.


There has recently been issued a treatise by this title, on grapes
and grape culture by Charles Mitzky, of this city. Its main feature
is the very full list of hardy grapes cultivated in this country with
their description, origin and history as far as known, and numerous
illustrations and colored plates. Over eight hundred varieties are
described, thus bringing together nearly all that have so far been
produced or made public. The work also contains chapters on planting,
pruning, cultivating, training, fertilizers, diseases and noxious insects
and their remedies, harvesting, storing, marketing and a brief account of
wine making, in fact almost everything of interest to the grape-grower
is here treated, some of the chapters being contributed by prominent
scientists and horticulturists.




THE PLANT BED.


The enterprise in getting out the artistic and truly beautiful Floral
Guide, and sending it into our homes during the inclement weather of
these winter days, when we have time to sit by the fireside and study
its pages, enables us, against the time to plant seeds, to know exactly
what we would like to have among vegetables and flowers. This beautiful
compendium of vegetables and flowers came as a herald of the new year,
and as the new year seems always to bring the spring season near, so it
naturally fills the mind with the pleasurable anticipations of the task
of seed planting.

The plant beds are little squares made of very rich soil, black and
friable, with sand intermixed, on the sunny side of the garden palings
that have a solid base board, or a wall or house, to afford protection.
The rich soil makes a good bottom heat for forcing gentle growth. My old
colored mammy, who always saved the garden seeds and gave them out as
needed and directed the gardening operations on the plantation, had the
plant beds made on each side of the garden gate, one set of little beds
for early vegetable plants, the other for flowers. The soil thoroughly
pulverized, and the seeds planted thickly, it is surprising how they
would spring into life, and the rapidity with which they would grow.
Thick planting of seeds is only to be advised when they are intended for
transplanting. I have seen the cabbage bed so full of plants that it
seemed as if two plants or more had sprung from every seed. Early and
late cabbage, the rows labeled, can be planted in the same bed; lettuce,
pepper grass, parsley and radishes in another, taking care to sow the
radish seed thinly as the plants will not transplant well, and the
radishes must be used for the table taken from the place where the seeds
are sown. Cabbages grow better when the small plants are transplanted to
the large bed where they are to stand for their season’s growth.

After these early vegetable plants have been set out, later on tomato
and egg plant seeds can be sown in the same beds. Nothing is gained by
forcing these latter, for in my experience certain vegetable and flower
seeds do better planted late, as the heat of summer is needed for their
development.

The plant bed can be made and planted early in the season. Here in the
South many persons plant in “old Christmas,” the first twelve days after
New Year, but February or March is better, I believe.

The flowers that do so well in company with these vegetables are
sweet alyssum, nemophila, mignonette, snapdragon, candytuft, verbena,
sanvitalia and petunias. Japanese pinks and Marguerite carnations, Phlox
Drummondii and poppies are better planted where they are to bloom as they
do not transplant well. Sweet alyssum and nemophila begin to bloom when
about an inch high, and can be transplanted at any stage of growth, even
in bloom; they are sweet little flowers that make lovely borders, cute
little jars, beautiful hanging baskets, and when planted in the sides of
jars that contain large plants, hang over the sides in masses of bloom.
The speckled pretty little blue nemophila always makes me think of birds’
nests full of speckled eggs in the cool green grass. Sweet alyssum I love
too well to write about; it would sound like exaggeration.

Petunias do well in the early beds, but also flourish and bloom finely if
their planting is deferred until the torenia, portulaca, cypress, zinnia,
tageta and real midsummer flowers are planted. None of these last do
any better for early planting. They will not bloom until their season,
summer, no matter how early they are planted. The beautiful fall bloomer,
cosmos, may be classed with them. Snapdragons, carnations and verbena
do not bloom in early spring from seed, but require an early start to
bloom in summer as their growth is not rapid. Sanvitalia, vinca, and a
long list of annuals are beautiful and well worth raising. Annuals are
cheap, but they subserve a purpose and nothing quite takes their place,
and I confess to a liking for flowers which I have raised from seeds.
It is easy to exaggerate the beauty of anything that stands in striking
contrast to its surroundings, but these plant beds early in the season,
green and growing, ahead of everything else, are as pretty as a picture,
and the young, crisp, green vegetables are suggestive and appetizing.

If twenty-five years of putting Mr. Vick’s seeds in the ground does not
entitle me to render a verdict in their favor as the best to be had, then
experience counts for nothing. A sure return for every seed put in the
ground is the answer they give to the question “What shall the harvest
be?”

Further north, doubtless, cold frames are better for early planting
of seeds, but in the South the plants are more healthy and stand
transplanting much better for exposure to the moderate cold of the early
season in their rich, warm little plant beds.

                                                      MRS. G. T. DRENNAN.

_Lexington, Miss._

       *       *       *       *       *

MARCH WORK.—At this time, the dividing line between winter and spring,
finish all the pruning in the open grounds. Grape vines, fruit trees,
deciduous hedges, and roses and many other plants will need attention. In
this climate sow peas as soon as the ground can be put in order. Start
hotbeds, and cold frames. Look after those flower seeds which should be
sowed early in the house.

       *       *       *       *       *

HELPS IN ECONOMY.

Stylish Gowns of Handsome Color at Small Cost—Diamond Dyes Make Old
Clothes Look Like New—Two Useful Books Given Away.

With a few packages of Diamond Dyes wonders can be done in making old
dresses, gowns, and suits look like new. Many families have not bought a
single new dress, wrap, or suit this winter, yet they dressed well and
fashionably, by dyeing their clothes with Diamond Dyes.

Those who buy one package as an experiment, find the dyes so easy to use
that they color over gowns, cloaks and suits for the whole family. The
Fast Black Diamond Dyes are especially popular, being easy to use and
making a rich black that will not fade, crock, or wash out.

    COUPON.

    This entitles any reader of Vick’s Magazine to one copy of
    “Successful Home Dyeing,” and “Mats and Rugs; Art and Fancy
    Work.”

For the home-dyer or rug-maker these books give complete directions
with many illustrations. Send above coupon to Wells, Richardson & Co.,
Burlington, Vt. and both books will be mailed free.




DON’T FORGET THE POTATOES.


    “An old lady sat in her old armchair,

    For days and for weeks her only fare,
    As she sat in her old armchair,
        Had been potatoes.

    But now they were gone, of bad or good.

    And she thought of the deacon over the way,
    The deacon so ready to worship and pray,
        Whose cellar was full of potatoes.

    She said, ‘I will send for the deacon to come.’

    And the deacon came over as fast as he could,
    Thinking to do the old lady some good,
        But never for once of potatoes.

    He prayed for patience, goodness and grace;
    But when he prayed, ‘Lord, give her peace,’
        She audibly sighed, ‘Give potatoes.’

    So ending his prayers, he started for home,
    The door closed behind, he heard a deep groan:
        ‘Oh, give to the hungry potatoes!’

    And the groan followed him all the way home;
    In the midst of the light it haunted his room;
        ‘Oh, give to the hungry potatoes!’

    He could bear it no longer; arose and dressed,
    From his well-filled cellar taking in haste
        A bag of his best potatoes.

    The widow’s heart leaped up for joy,
    Her face was pale and haggard no more,
    ‘Now,’ said the deacon, ‘shall we pray?’
    ‘Yes,’ said the widow, ‘now you may.’

    And would you hear this simple tale,
    Pray for the poor, and praying, prevail?
    Then preface your prayer with alms and good deeds;
    Search out the poor, their wants and needs;
    Pray for their peace and grace, spiritual food,
    For wisdom and guidance—all these are good—
        But don’t forget the potatoes!”

                                    —_The Independent._

       *       *       *       *       *

A CINCINNATI MIRACLE.

WHY MR. CHARLES B. NOBLE IS BEING CONGRATULATED.

A Remarkable Case of Being Completely Cured of Paralysis After Nearly
Three Years of Suffering and Eminent Physicians Had Declared Their Best
Efforts Baffled.

Newspaper men as a rule place little credence in patent medicine stories
and seldom bother to even read them. This is not to be wondered at
when it is taken into consideration how often they are called upon by
unscrupulous persons to fabricate and publish stories of remarkable cures
and perhaps print a picture of the mythical man or woman supposed to
have been cured. That all medicine advertisements are not mere “fakes,”
and that all newspaper men are not equally prejudiced is proven by a
story published in the _Cincinnati Times-Star_ of a well-known newspaper
man whose life was saved by reading an advertisement. So remarkable and
interesting is the story that it is here reproduced as published in the
_Times-Star_.

Mr. Charles B. Noble, the well-known litterateur, who has been suffering
for nearly three years with paralysis, was upon the street to-day,
cheerful and active and the recipient of congratulations from his many
friends. There is a bond of unity between all newspaper men, so that Mr.
Noble’s case appeals to every member of the craft as well as to every
one afflicted as he was. Mr. Noble has spent the last three years in
traveling from city to city seeking skilled physicians, to whom he has
appealed in vain for relief. Knowing this, a reporter expressed surprise
at the remarkable cure, but Mr. Noble, after executing a jig to show that
he was as sound as he looked, let the reporter into the secret of his
cure.

“It was a hard time I had of it,” said he, “but the last medicine we take
is always the one that cures, and I have taken the last. I was paralyzed
on March 9, 1890, while in the employ of the David Williams Publishing
Company of New York City as their traveling representative from
Cincinnati. I found the traveling a great help to me, both in a financial
and a literary way, but suddenly stricken down as I was at Somerset, O.,
150 miles from Cincinnati, I was incapacitated for both writing and money
making. Luckily my literary productions had been remunerative, and I had
a snug bank account laid up, but these three years have made a drain on
it.

“I sought a score of physicians, going to the best specialists in
Cincinnati, Chattanooga and Pittsburg. Twelve Cincinnati doctors,
pronounced my case incurable, but I would not give up, and after seeking
in vain for relief in Pittsburg and Chattanooga, consulted the best
medical talent in Chicago. Up to January 17, 1893, I had spent $2,500
for doctors and medicine and was about to give up in despair when I got
hold of Dr. Williams’ Pink Pills for Pale People, through reading the
advertisements.

“From the first week of using the remedy I made a steady improvement, and
on April 12, I put up my cane after using it thirty months. I certainly
believe this medicine is all the proprietors claim for it, and that it
will do all they say it will. I take pleasure in recommending it to all
similarly afflicted. Like many who have tried medicine in vain I was
doubtful of its value at first, and only used it when I grew desperate.
Now I can not praise it too highly. It has restored me to health and
strength and I feel grateful accordingly. Dr. Whittaker pronounced it a
hopeless case of locomotor ataxia.

“Yes, I know there are many who will fancy anything you say about my
case is an advertisement, but if they want any corroboration, let them
address me at the Y. M. C. A. building, and I will cheerfully answer all
inquiries if stamps are enclosed.”

Pink Pills, while advertised and handled by the drug trade as a
proprietary article, are not considered a patent medicine in the sense
that name implies. For many years previous to their general manufacture
they were used as a prescription. At first their great restorative powers
were not fully recognized and they were chiefly prescribed for impure
blood and general weakness. Their remarkable success in such cases, and
the fact that there was nothing in the formula that could do any harm,
even if they did not do any good, led to their being tried in cases where
the skill of the physician and the power of medicine had entirely faded.
Their power of restoration seemed to border on the marvelous. They proved
to be a never-failing specific for such diseases as locomotor ataxia,
partial paralysis, St. Vitus’ dance, sciatica, neuralgia, rheumatism,
nervous headache, the after effect of La Grippe, palpitation of the
heart, pale and sallow complexions, and all diseases of the blood such as
scrofula, chronic erysipelas, etc.

They are also a specific for troubles peculiar to females, such as
suppressions, irregularities, and all forms of weakness. They build up
the blood and restore the glow of health to pale and sallow cheeks. In
case of men they effect a radical cure in all cases arising from mental
worry, overwork or excesses of whatever nature.

Pink Pills are sold in boxes (never in loose form, by the dozen or
hundred, and the public is cautioned against numerous imitations sold
in this shape) at 50 cents a box or six boxes for $2.50, and may be had
of all druggists or direct by mail from Dr. Williams’ Medicine Company,
Schenectady, N. Y., or Brockville, Ont. The price at which these Pills
are sold makes a course of treatment inexpensive as compared with other
remedies or medical treatment.




GROWING ONION SETS.


While the practice of growing onions directly from seed is becoming more
extended all over the country, still the time will never come probably
when the old-time practice of growing the crop from sets will be done
away with, especially in the South. With the constantly increasing
acreage devoted to this splendid esculent it is quite likely more onion
sets will be raised and planted ten years hence than there is at this
time. Southern truckers and market gardeners, along with those who only
grow simply for home use, will continue to use sets for growing the first
crop which is used or marketed in a green or unmatured state. Thousands
of acres are yearly planted in the South, putting out the sets anywhere
from September to November, both inclusive. Most any “tyro” in gardening
can grow a crop of onions from the sets where only failure would result
if the seeds were used. There is hardly anything surer than making “sets”
grow, whereas it is not always sure that one gets onion seeds that are
good and of such a variety as will make a good crop in our Southern
climate. So much by way of preface.

The Southern gardeners and truckers depend almost entirely upon the
Middle and Northern States for their onion sets, although it is quite
practicable for them to raise their own sets if they choose to do it.
The Southern trucker it seems as a rule, however, would prefer to have
others grow his sets for him. This is all very well when he can buy them
at $1.50 to $2.50 a bushel, but oftentimes he has to pay twice this sum
for his sets, occasionally three times. There is an advantage in the
trucker growing his own sets. He can grow just the variety that better
suits our climate, sets of which he cannot always get with any certainty.
The several varieties of Italian or Spanish onions are far preferable for
the South—kinds like the New Queen, Rocca, Early Nocera and some others,
these do much better than the American varieties.

_How to raise the Sets._—There are two ways of growing—broadcast or in
drills. The latter is to be preferred. For the purpose choose medium
land, not very rich in humus or nitrogen, but as clean land as possible.
Sowings can be made any time from February 15 to April 15. Plow the soil
and harrow it and run a light roller over it. Lay off shallow drills
fifteen to twenty inches apart. These shallow drills, not deeper than a
quarter of an inch, should be _one and a half or two inches wide_. Just
prior to sowing whiten these drills with landplaster. Using the freshest
seed attainable, sow the seeds carefully along the drills at the rate of
twelve to fifteen to the square inch. Cover lightly with a rake and then
run a garden roller over the drills. If the seeds are good there will be
a pretty show of onions in the course of ten days. Cultivate very shallow
and just enough to keep down all weeds. Any weeds coming up in the drills
must be hand-pulled.

When the small onions later on show signs of maturity go along and pull
them and let them lie until well cured. Then take up and spread rather
thinly in the coolest, dryest place possible. They can be spread out
under any outhouse if safe from poultry, etc. If put in a loft, or where
there is much light, spread a slight layer of straw over the sets. Do not
wait until the onions _die down_ before pulling, but pull just as soon as
the tops show a little yellow. As remarked, these sets will be planted
out again in September and October, and as late as November 15.

This is a brief statement of procedure. The directions followed, there
will be no good reason for failure _if the seeds are good_.

                                                              S. A. COOK.

_Milledgeville, Ga._

       *       *       *       *       *

MUSIC WITHOUT A TEACHER

(EUREKA METHOD.)

    Organ,
    Piano,
    Violin,
    Banjo,
    Cornet,
    Flute,
    Guitar,
    Piccolo,
    Accordion,
    Mandolin,
    Clarinet,
    Fife.

=Winner’s “Eureka” Instruction books= do for you =just what a teacher
would do=. With the Winner Instruction Book for any instrument, you can
learn to play any simple, easy piece of music on that instrument as
=quickly as by employing a teacher once a week=.

You do not need to know anything about music, as these books teach all
the rudiments, and explain the meaning of all musical terms. They are
very simple and =FULLY ILLUSTRATED=.

Besides the instruction pages, each book contains nearly a hundred
well-chosen pieces for that especial instrument. This alone would cost
from $2.00 to $3.00 if purchased separately.

They are intended for pupils living at a distance from the music teacher,
or those whose means will not enable them to employ one.

In ordering ask for =Winner’s “Eureka” Method=, and state for what
instrument it is wanted. Any one of the volumes will be mailed, postpaid,
on receipt of choice.

75 CENTS.

Oliver Ditson Company, 453-463 Washington St., Boston.

C. H. Ditson & Co., N. Y. J. E. Ditson & Co., Phila.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

=FREE= A fine 14k gold plated watch to every reader of this paper. Cut
this out and send it to us with your full name and address, and we will
send you one of these elegant, richly jeweled, gold finished watches by
express for examination, and if you think it is equal in appearance to
any $25.00 gold watch pay our sample price, $3.50, and it is yours. We
send with the watch our guarantee that you can return it at any time
within one year if not satisfactory, and if you sell or cause the sale
of six we will give you =One Free=. Write at once, as we shall send out
samples for 60 days only. Address

THE NATIONAL M’F’G & IMPORTING CO., 334 Dearborn St., Chicago, Ill.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

=FAT FOLKS= Reduced =15 lbs.= a month; any one can make remedy at home.
Miss M. Ainley, Supply, Ark., says: “I lost 60 lbs. and feel splendid.”
No starving. No sickness. Particulars (sealed) 2 cts. HALL & CO., “A,”
Box 404, St. Louis, Mo.

       *       *       *       *       *

DON’T DYE

Until you see the _beautiful_ and _fast_ colors made with “PERFECTION”
Dyes. Sample cards showing new colors sent FREE. For 40c. we will send
you 6 pkgs. of any colors you wish to try. Single pkg. 10c. Agents
wanted. W. CUSHING & CO., Box 24, Foxcroft, Me.




BEGONIAS, PERHAPS.


To be sure “Major Zero” is in full command; the ground is covered with
snow, and the trees like gaunt skeletons stand out in bold relief
against the background of sky. But wintry as it seems and is out of
doors it is none too early to begin planning for the coming summer
campaign. Catalogues from nurserymen, florists and seedsmen are pouring
in upon us laden with good things. Some are really beautiful. I’ve been
experimenting a little in window gardening, but—woe is me; some varieties
have not responded well to my treatment, not from any fault of the plant
I am confident, but through my ignorance of its needs.

Different plants require different treatment and temperature, but I find
as a rule the majority treat them all alike and wonder why they do not
have any “luck” with some kinds. For example, I gave my pet carnations
just as much water, and as often, as my geraniums. They began to look
sick and I lost three before I found out they did not require much
wetting.

I’m thinking seriously of trying the different varieties of some one
plant, begonias, perhaps. According to catalogue description they are
admirably adapted to house culture. They do not require much sun and are
free from insects. Most varieties blossom freely, and even if they did
not the foliage is very attractive. Countess Louise Erdody is a curiosity
and has a history. It was produced from seed planted in the garden of
Count Erdody, a Hungarian, and named in honor of the Countess. During the
summer begonias may be grown upon the piazza and a plant stand filled
with well rooted specimens would be a beautiful ornament.

                                                    NELLIE STEDMAN WHITE.

       *       *       *       *       *

A Splendid Free Offer.

To every reader of this paper who is sick or ailing, we will send a
free trial package of the best remedy in the world for the speedy and
permanent cure of Dyspepsia, Indigestion, Constipation, Biliousness, Sour
Stomach, Liver and Kidney Complaints, Sick Headache, Nervous Debility,
and Consumption. It costs you nothing to try this wonderful remedy, as
we send it free and prepaid. It has cured thousands of the above-named
complaints and will cure you. Write to-day. Address

EGYPTIAN DRUG CO., 29 Park Row New York.

       *       *       *       *       *

“FLEXIBONE MOULDED” MODEL

Awarded Medal at World’s Columbian Exposition.

[Illustration: SEE IT BEND.]

Why Not Buy a Corset that Fits?

(It costs no more than one that does not.)

Because of its peculiar construction

IT MUST FIT BETTER AND EASIER

than any other style of corset.

THE SECRET??

is that it is =MOULDED= and not =straight stayed=. Do you want to know
more about it? Ask your dealer for it, or =write us for descriptive
circular=. Sample by mail, postpaid, in Royal Jeans $2.00, or English
Sateens $3.00. All popular colors. Workmanship unexcelled. Materials
highest quality. Can return and money refunded, after one week’s wear,
(white excepted) if not satisfactory. Mention this Magazine.

CORONET CORSET CO., Jackson, Mich.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

Newcomb Fly-Shuttle Rag Carpet LOOM

Weaves 100 yards per day. Catalogue free.

C. N. Newcomb, 365 W. St. Davenport, Iowa.

When writing to advertisers, mention Vick’s Magazine.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

HATCH CHICKENS BY STEAM

With the Improved Excelsior Incubator.

_Simple, Perfect, Self-Regulating._ Thousands in successful operation.
Guaranteed to hatch a larger percentage of fertile eggs at less cost than
any other Hatcher. Lowest priced first-class Hatcher made.

Circulars free. Send 6c. for Illus. Catalogue.

=Geo. H. Stahl, Quincy, Ill.=

When writing to advertisers, mention Vick’s Magazine.

       *       *       *       *       *

_NEW CARDS_ Send 2c. stamp for the LARGEST SAMPLE BOOK of genuine Hidden
Name, Silk Fringe, Envelope & Calling Cards ever offered. BUCKEYE CARD
CO., Laceyville, Ohio.

       *       *       *       *       *

Derma-Royale is pure, mild and so harmless that a whole bottle may be
drank without the least serious effect.

LOVELY FACES, WHITE HANDS.

[Illustration]

Nothing will CURE, CLEAR and WHITEN the skin so quickly as

DERMA-ROYALE

The new discovery for curing cutaneous affections, removing
discolorations from the cuticle and bleaching and brightening the
complexion.

THERE NEVER WAS ANYTHING LIKE IT.

It is as harmless as dew and so simple a child can use it. It is highly
recommended by Physicians and its sure results warrant us in offering
=$500 _REWARD_=—To assure the public of its merits we agree to forfeit
Five Hundred Dollars CASH, for any case of eczema, pimples, blotches,
moth-patches, brown spots, liver spots, blackheads, ugly or muddy skin,
unnatural redness, freckles, tan or any other cutaneous discolorations
or blemishes, (excepting birth-marks, scars, and those of a scrofulous
or kindred nature) that Derma-Royale will not quickly remove and cure.
We also agree to forfeit Five Hundred Dollars to any person whose skin
can be injured in the slightest possible manner, or to anyone whose
complexion (no matter in how bad condition it may be), will not be
cleared, whitened, improved and beautified by the use of Derma-Royale.

Put up in elegant style in large eight-ounce bottles.

=Price, $1.00.= EVERY BOTTLE GUARANTEED.

WE WILL BE GLAD TO SEND ANYONE A ONE DOLLAR BOTTLE FOR NOTHING TO
INTRODUCE IT. ☞ SEND US YOUR FULL POST-OFFICE ADDRESS TODAY

THE DERMA-ROYALE COMPANY, Corner Baker & Vine Streets, CINCINNATI, OHIO.

       *       *       *       *       *

FITS CURED

(_From U. S. Journal of Medicine._)

Prof. W. H. Peeke, who makes a specialty of Epilepsy, has without doubt
treated and cured more cases than any living Physician; his success is
astonishing. We have heard of cases of 20 years’ standing cured by him.
He publishes a valuable work on this disease which he sends with a large
bottle of his absolute cure, free to any sufferer who may send their P.O.
and Express address. We advise anyone wishing a cure to address:

Prof. W. H. PEEKE, F.D., 4 Cedar St., New York

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

HERE’S YOUR CHANCE

TO INTRODUCE THE FAMOUS =IMPERIAL WHEELS=

we sell samples at =absolutely manufacturers’ prices=. Strictly high
grade. All latest improvements. Illustrated circular free. =Great
opportunity for Agents. AMES & FROST CO. CHICAGO, ILL.=

       *       *       *       *       *

_Ceylon Teas_ delighted all at the World’s Fair. Sample package sent to
any part of the United States for six cents, with price-list. Goods sent
prepaid. Address:

=IMPORTERS TEA CO., 60 Wabash Ave., Chicago.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

The Rocker Washer

is warranted to wash =100 PIECES IN ONE HOUR=, as clean as can be washed
on the washboard. Write for prices and description.

ROCKER WASHER CO., Ft. Wayne, Ind.

Liberal inducements to live agents.

       *       *       *       *       *

Asthma

The =African Kola Plant= discovered in Congo, West Africa, is Nature’s
Sure Cure for Asthma. =Cure Guaranteed or No Pay.= Export Office 1164
Broadway, New York. For =Large Trial Case, FREE by Mail= address KOLA
IMPORTING CO., 132 Vine St., Cincinnati, Ohio.

       *       *       *       *       *

For Good Living

Send address, and we mail free our illustrated booklet, “From Ranch to
Table,” a write-up of the cattle industry of the great plains, from the
“branding of the maverick” to the “round-up” of the prime steer into Rex
Brand Beef Extract.

THE CUDAHY PACKING CO., South Omaha, Neb.

       *       *       *       *       *

STAMPING ALPHABET FREE!

Send us 10c. for catalogue of =BRIGGS STAMPING PATTERNS= and we will send
you, FREE, an alphabet of 26 letters, =ready to stamp=. WALKER-JOHNSON
CO., Box V. 3, Irvington, N. J.

       *       *       *       *       *

=Sound Discs= are invisible, and comfortable. Relieve more cases of

[Illustration: DEAFNESS]

than all devices in the world. H. A. Wales, 638 Ashland Block, Chicago.

       *       *       *       *       *

=SHORTHAND.= You can write sentences in an hour by the celebrated
non-shading, non-position, connective vowel =PERNIN= method. Read like
print; great brevity. Lessons by MAIL. Trial FREE. Write H. M. Pernin,
Author, Detroit, Mich.

       *       *       *       *       *

Miller’s Wall Paper.

Get the Best. New designs for ’94. Lowest prices. Samples 5 cts. Perfect
imitation stained glass.

AGENTS WANTED.

=J. KERWIN MILLER & CO., 543 Smithfield Street, Pittsburgh, Pa.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

YOUR NAME _on 25 BEAUTIFUL CARDS_

1 AUTOGRAPH ALBUM, 1 RING, 1 KNIFE, 1 Pocket Pencil, 1mt. GOLD PEN &
AGENT’S OUTFIT OF 480 SAMPLE CARDS, SCRAP PICTURES, &c. ALL 10c. KING
CARD CO., NORTH HAVEN, CONN.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

PRINT Your Own CARDS

PRESS $3. Circular size $8. Newspaper size $44. Type setting easy,
printed directions. Send 2 stamps for catalogue presses, type, cards &c.
to factory. KELSEY & CO. Meriden, Conn.

       *       *       *       *       *

A BEAUTIFUL CRAZY QUILT of 500 sq. inches can be made with our package
of 60 splendid Silk and Satin pieces, assorted bright colors, =25c.=; 5
packs, $1.00. Silk Plush and Velvet, 40 large pieces, assorted colors,
=50c.= Emb. silk, =40c.= oz. Lemarie’s Silk Mill, Little Ferry, N.J.

       *       *       *       *       *

WALLPAPER

=3 cts.= to =50 cts.= a roll. Send 8 cts. for 100 fine samples. =$1= will
buy handsome paper and border for a large room. =THOS. J. MYERS, 1206
Market Street, Philadelphia, Pa.=

       *       *       *       *       *

CARE OF FRUIT TREES.—Are we guiltless if we always take from the tree
and return to it little or nothing? Has man nothing to do, that he may
receive and enjoy these luscious and health-giving fruits? Should he
merely set the roots of a tree into the soil and then leave it to combat
with starvation and neglect, as thousands of trees throughout New England
are left to do? Ride through the country and notice the many orchards
standing, sod-bound and in wet undrained soil perhaps, with all that can
be grown from the soil in the way of hay and pasture taken off and not a
pennysworth of fertilizer added to it for the trees. Not a dead limb cut
out, to say nothing of those chafing or growing crossways, not an insect
destroyed; and the poor tree, how it is trying to do its best while the
owner, who has neglected every essential thing on his part for successful
results, exclaims, “It don’t pay to raise fruit.” I knew a farmer who
plowed his field for corn and planted it, but who never cultivated,
plowed or hoed it. He had no corn. Did he deserve any? He said it did not
pay to raise corn. I know another farmer who prepared his ground nicely
for corn, planted and cared for it intelligently, and received upwards of
a hundred bushels of shell corn per acre. He was amply paid for his care
and expense. He said it paid him.—_Edward Hoyt before the Mass. Hort.
Society._

       *       *       *       *       *

=DEAFNESS & HEAD NOISES CURED= by Peck’s Invisible Tubular Ear Cushions.
Whispers heard. Successful when all remedies fail. Sold only by =F.
HISCOX, 853 B’way, N.Y.= Write for book of proofs =FREE=

       *       *       *       *       *

FREE SPRAY PUMP to one person in each place. We mean it. If you mean
business and want agency send 10c. We will send a complete pump that will
do the work of any $10 spray. =A. SPIERS, Box 51 No. Windham, Maine.=

       *       *       *       *       *

“DON’T MISS IT.”

“Beautiful Women” for 1894, handsomely illustrated, full of NEW
ideas that are religiously observed by all SOCIETY BELLS. Intensely
interesting. 25 cts. in stamps or silver. 246 West 76th Street, New York.

       *       *       *       *       *

=AGENTS WANTED ON SALARY or COMMISSION=, to handle the =New Patent
Chemical Ink Erasing Pencil=. Agents making =$50= per week. =MONROE
ERASER MF’G CO.=, X 506 LACROSSE, WIS.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

_YOUR NAME_ on 25 Lovely Cards, 2 Rings, 1 Handkerchief, 1 Pen & Holder,
1 Pencil & Eraser, 1 Scarf Pin, 480 Scrap Pictures, Verses, etc. Agent’s
Outfit of Cards & Novelties, ALL FOR 10c. GLEN CARD CO, Box D, NORTH
HAVEN, CONN.

[Illustration]

       *       *       *       *       *

_A WOMAN’S SUCCESS_ For two years I have made =$25 a week at Home=.
Instructions =FREE= to lady readers. Send stamp, (No humbug), =MRS. J. A.
MANNING, Box 12, Anna, Ohio=.

       *       *       *       *       *

CONSTIPATION

CAUSE and CURE.

Address, =UNIVERSITY MEDICAL CO., DEPT. A 74= (Treatise mailed free.) =75
43rd St., Chicago, Ill.=

       *       *       *       *       *

=SALESMEN WANTED= to sell our goods by samples to the wholesale and retail
trade; sell on sight to every business man or firm; liberal salary. Money
advanced for advertising and expenses. Permanent position. Address with
stamp

KING MF’G CO., A 30, CHICAGO, ILL.

       *       *       *       *       *

PILES

Instant relief, final cure in a few days, and never returns; no purge; no
salve; no suppository. =Remedy mailed free.= Address J. H. REEVES, Box
3290, New York City, N. Y.

       *       *       *       *       *

YOUR WALL AND OUR PAPER

For Beauty and Economy cannot be excelled. Send 10 cents for postage and
receive 100 samples Fine Wall Paper, with match borders and ceilings.

=Wm. Wallace, 1625 Pine St., Philadelphia, Pa.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

YOUR FUTURE REVEALED.

Send your name and address to Box W 1692, Boston, Mass., for free book,
which tells you how to _read your own fortune_.

       *       *       *       *       *

=FREE MUSIC= 157 pieces latest =Popular Music= and charming =Magazine=
3 months; all for 10 cents. American Nation Co., Box 1726, Boston, Mass.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: Waverley]

The Sensation of the Year

_Strictly High Grade. Warranted One Year._

$85

28-inch size 28 lbs. fitted with Waverley Clincher Tires, made under
Gormully & Jeffery’s Patents.

Equal to any High Grade Bicycle made, regardless of price. Full line 24,
26 and 28-inch sizes, Ladies and Gents. Ask for Catalogue “A,” mailed
free.

=_INDIANA BICYCLE COMPANY_, 7 Street=, Indianapolis, Ind., U. S. A.

       *       *       *       *       *

DO YOU USE

_Buttermilk_

Toilet Soap

The best, purest and most economical of all soaps?

A great =complexion cleanser=, makes your skin feel =new=. We want you to
try it. At all dealers, or sample cake by mail 12c.

COSMO BUTTERMILK SOAP CO. 185-187 WABASH AVENUE CHICAGO, ILL.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: PRIMLEY’S CALIFORNIA FRUIT CHEWING GUM

A DELICIOUS CONFECTION]

Makes Sweet Breath, Clean Teeth and Good Digestion. Heartburn and
Dyspepsia disappear on its use. DON’T MAKE ANY MISTAKE, GET =PRIMLEY’S=.

Send five outside wrappers of either California Fruit or California
Pepsin Chewing Gum and two 2-cent stamps, and we will send you “Strange
Case of Dr. Jekyll—Mr. Hyde,” by Robert Louis Stevenson, or any of our
other 1700 fine books. Send for list. For 10 cents and two outside
wrappers we will mail you one elegant pack of our Souvenir Playing Cards.

J. P. PRIMLEY, Chicago, Ill.

       *       *       *       *       *

ONE CENT IS THE COST

of information valuable to you if you hold mortgage or other investment
securities in Colorado, Wyoming, Kansas, Nebraska, Utah or New Mexico.
Address by postal card or letter

WOLFE, WEBB & CHITTENDEN INVESTMENT COMPANY, DENVER, COLORADO.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: McMULLEN’S]

GALVANIZED WOVEN WIRE

FENCING

WIRE ROPE SELVAGE.

POULTRY & RABBIT NETTING

=Railroad, Farm, Garden, Cemetery, Lawn Fencing.= Prices down. =Freight
paid.= _Catal’g. free._ =McMullen Woven Wire Fence Co., Chicago.=

       *       *       *       *       *

Free to INVALID WOMEN.

Why suffer longer, when you can receive free a diagnosis of your
troubles by Dr. Wallace S. Springsteen. Send at once for symptom sheet
and treatise. You cannot lose anything, therefore send now. Something
entirely new in medical treatment,—successful when everything else had
failed.

=SPRINGSTEEN MEDICINE CO.=, 381 Central Ave., Cleveland, O.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

MURRAY VEHICLES and HARNESS

Time Tried and Tested and Endorsed the world over as the =Best and
Cheapest on Earth=.

    =Single Buggy Harness=,      =5.95=
    =Double Buggy Harness=,     =15.70=
    =Single Farm Harness=,      =17.67=
    =Double Farm Harness=,      =22.94=
    =Top Buggies=,              =55.95=
    =Road Carts=,               =14.90=
    =Road Wagons=,              =31.75=
    =Spring Wagons=,            =43.50=
    =Farm Wagons= (2 horse)     =39.50=

Fine 160 page Catalogue, free.

=Wilber H. Murray Mfg. Co., Cincinnati, O.=

       *       *       *       *       *

You Dye in 30 minutes

Turkey red on cotton that won’t freeze, boil or wash out. No other will
do it. Package to color 2 lbs., by mail, 10 cts.; 6, any color—for wool
or cotton, 40c. Big pay Agents. Write quick. _Mention this paper._
=FRENCH DYE CO. Vassar, Mich.=

       *       *       *       *       *

_THE IMPROVED_ VICTOR INCUBATOR

[Illustration]

Hatches Chickens by Steam. Absolutely =self-regulating=. The simplest,
most reliable, and cheapest first-class Hatcher in the market. Circulars
free. Catalogue 4 cents.

=GEO. ERTEL & CO., Quincy, Ill.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

Mammoth New Catalogue Almanac

AND GUIDE TO POULTRY RAISERS.

64 large pages, printed in colors. Description of all leading varieties
of fowls. Over 50 fine illustrations. Plans for Poultry houses.
Remedies for all diseases. Recipe for Poultry Powders. The finest thing
out—everybody wants one. Only 10c.

=C. C. SHOEMAKER, Freeport, Ill., U.S.A.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

=LADIES!= If you desire a transparent, CLEAR, FRESH complexion, FREE from
blotch, blemish, roughness, coarseness, redness, freckles or pimples use
DR. CAMPBELL’S SAFE ARSENIC COMPLEXION WAFERS. These wonderful wafers
have the effect of enlarging, invigorating, or filling out any shrunken,
shrivelled or undeveloped parts. Price, by mail, $1, 6 Boxes, $5. Depot,
218 6th Ave., New York, and all Druggists.

       *       *       *       *       *

=10 CENTS= (silver) pays for our handsome PEOPLE’S JOURNAL one year, _on
trial_, and your address in our “AGENTS’ DIRECTORY,” which goes whirling
all over the United States to firms who wish to mail =FREE=, sample
papers, magazines, books, pictures, cards etc., with terms, and our
patrons receive bushels of mail. Greatest bargain in America. =_Try it_=,
you will be =Pleased=.

=T. D. Campbell, X 118 Boyleston, Ind.=

       *       *       *       *       *

CARDS

Send 2c. stamp for Sample Book of all the FINEST and Latest Style Cards
for 1894. We sell GENUINE CARDS NOT TRASH. UNION CARD CO., COLUMBUS, OHIO.




MESEMBRYANTHEMUM.


The mesembryanthemum, usually called ice-plant, is one of the most
effective border plants. Nothing can be prettier around a small bed than
a thick edging of these sparkling rich green plants, and yet I have never
seen it used in this manner except in my own garden. The plants grow
larger, more robust, coarser perhaps, when used in this way, but they
form an unbroken edge of great richness. Sow the seeds in the house and
transplant when danger of frost is over; shade for a few days from sun
and wind, and do not let the ground dry out about the roots until the
plants have started into growth again; after that an occasional watering
is all they require. Treated in this fashion they grow riotously and
yield a wealth of beautiful, cool looking foliage for bouquets and all
kinds of cut flower work, which has the additional merit of keeping fresh
a long time even under unfavorable circumstances. One can pick long
sprays of this pretty greenery without it being missed from the plants in
the least. A low glass dish filled with ice-plant, the sprays drooping
over the edges gracefully, and a few pale pink flowers peeping out
between the leaves, is an exceedingly pretty center-piece for the dinner
table. In putting out the plants set them about ten inches apart.

MRS. S. H. SNIDER.

       *       *       *       *       *

_Vick’s Seeds contain the germ of life. They grow, flourish and produce
abundantly._

       *       *       *       *       *

CONSUMPTION SURELY CURED.

TO THE EDITOR—Please inform your readers that I have a positive remedy
for the above named disease. By its timely use thousands of hopeless
cases have been permanently cured. I shall be glad to send two bottles of
my remedy free to any of your readers who have consumption if they will
send me their express and post office address. T. A. Slocum, M. C., 183
Pearl St., New York.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

THE NAME TO REMEMBER

when buying a BICYCLE

IS

A. W. GUMP & CO.,

Dayton, Ohio.

=$30.00= to =$50.00 saved= on many =new and second-hand Bicycles=. Lists
free. =Over 2,000 in stock.= Cash or time.

=AGENTS WANTED.=

=When writing to advertisers, mention Vick’s Magazine.=

       *       *       *       *       *

100 _USEFUL_ Articles wanted in every family, with full instructions
to Agents. How to make an easy living. All postpaid for 10 cents. HOME
SUPPLY CO., CLINTONVILLE, CONN.

       *       *       *       *       *

HANDY COBBLER

[Illustration]

COMPLETE SHOE and Harness Kit

for home use. Great time and money saver. Articles separate cost $6.
Price 26 articles, boxed, 20 lbs., $3. No. 2 without extra harness tools,
22 articles, 17 lbs., $2. Catalogue free. Agents wanted. In order give R.
R. or Exp. station and name this paper.

=KUHN & CO., Moline, Ill=

       *       *       *       *       *

BABY CARRIAGES Shipped C. O. D.

[Illustration]

    $18.50 Carriage for $9.25.
    $12.00     ”     ”  $5.95.
     $5.00     ”     ”  $2.75.

Anywhere to anyone at =Wholesale Prices= without paying one cent in
advance. We pay freight. Buy from factory. Save dealers’ profits. Large
illustrated catalog free. Address =Cash Buyers’ Union, 164 West Van Buren
Street, B 27, Chicago, Ill.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: BALD HEADS]

NO CURE, NO PAY.

Mustache, No Pay.

DANDRUFF CURED.

CALL OR WRITE

PROF. G. BIRKHOLZ, Room 4, Cor. 5th Ave. & 14th St., NEW YORK.

       *       *       *       *       *

LACE.

Ladies send 5 two-cent stamps for samples of fine imported Laces. We will
send FREE as a premium a piece containing =12 yards of handsome lace=
for a one year’s subscription to “OUR COUNTRY HOMES MONTHLY MAGAZINE” at
$1.00 a year. Write us now. =Agents Wanted.= We also give as premiums
Watches, Jewelry, Books, Albums, etc., etc. Address Publishers Our
Country Homes Monthly Magazine, 302 & 304 S. Salina St., Syracuse, N. Y.

=When writing to advertisers, mention Vick’s Magazine.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

FREE

480 Sample styles of New Cards & Premiums for 1894. Agt’s large Sample
Book of genuine Hidden Name, Silk Fringe, Envelope, Bevel edge & Fancy
shape Calling Cards, all for 2 cents. CROWN CARD CO., CADIZ, OHIO.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

“SANITAS.”

Unfermented, CONCENTRATED and Pure

JUICE OF THE GRAPE.

THE PHYSICIAN’S AID.

Our mission is solely to supply Nature’s own pure food. It is the mission
of the physician, who understands his patient’s needs, to supply the
medicine. Our reason for offering this product to the public, to you,
is that it is pure. There is need of such an article of grape juice. We
have the testimony of hundreds of letters to prove the assertion. Nearly
all the bottled juice now on the market contains an antiseptic of some
description to prevent fermentation, generally salicylic acid. Why does
such juice fail as a food? Simply because the antiseptic principle that
preserves the juice in the bottle exerts a similar influence in the
stomach, and prevents the natural action that is part of Nature’s plan
for assimilating food. Our concentrated juice of the grape is absolutely
free from all antiseptics, and is Nature’s best food and strength
producer for weak and defective digestive organs.

Invalids will, of course, seek the advice of their physicians as to the
proper time or quantity, but well people may partake freely, and know
that the certainty of gain far overshadows the possibilities of excess.

THE CONSUMER’S SUPPORT.

The grape cure has been found in many cases to rapidly reorganize and
reconstruct the blood current, and to surprise the tissues and excite
the nervous system into health. The beverage form of grape juice is an
agreeable and wholesome nutrient in a great variety of sicknesses. Its
fruit acids, its blood salts and its grape sugar make it a valuable
medicine. It affords a nourishing and easily managed food for dyspeptics
of many kinds. We seek to supplant alcoholic and fermented drinks by
something more wholesome, more satisfying and refreshing—something
embodying all the best principles of ripe grapes marred by nothing that
would falsely stimulate or excite, and in the new era that is dawning,
the life-giving principles of the grape, in their purest condition, will
enter every home as a comfort and a blessing, instead of a delusion and a
snare.

Its sub-acid taste and easiness of assimilation give it a high value
in fevers of every sort. Its concentration, keeping qualities and
palatability give it certain advantages over the beverage form. It is
agreeably administered in aerated water or hot or cold water.

Two varieties of our concentrated juice suitable for redilution with any
aerated, carbonated or pure cold water are bottled under our labels—i.e.,
Red, Zinfandel, White, Muscatel.

Sold only in pint bottles, the contents of which are equal to ONE-HALF
GALLON OF FRESH GRAPE JUICE. =Price, 65 cents per bottle.= For sale by
leading druggists and grocers. Send for descriptive circular.

THE CALIFORNIA GRAPE FOOD CO.

=145 Broadway, New York.= J. S. Twombly, Selling Agent, 27 Commercial
St., Boston.

=Los Gatos, California.= Norman Barbour, Selling Agent, 77 Warren St.,
New York.




MARGUERITE CARNATIONS.


“My first sowing was early in February, 1892. The plants came into bloom
the middle of June, and I had more or less flowers from them all through
the following winter and spring. In 1893 I made two sowings, one the
beginning of February, and another the end of March, to secure plants for
winter flowering. About eighty of these in six-inch pots were plunged out
of doors until the middle of November; then removed indoors and placed in
light airy position. They have been flowering profusely ever since, and
will continue doing so to the end of May.” These statements are made by
John Milne in the _Journal of Horticulture_. Another writer in the same
publication says:

“Those who have not yet grown these carnations have missed much. I sowed
some seeds at the end of February last year in a mild heat, and the
seedlings were potted when large enough, the bulk of them eventually
finding their way into pots five and a half inches in diameter. Some few
were grown in pots an inch less, but I noted those in the larger pots
were much better every way. Small pots do not afford sufficient scope
for the roots, as these are freely made, and being very fibrous they
absorb a quantity of moisture. A moderately rich compost is essential,
the plants requiring a fair amount of stimulative food to enable them to
continue longer in flower than they do when in a starved condition. To
test these carnations I planted some in the kitchen garden, but I found
that those in pots flowered much the best. About ninety per cent. of
these carnations come double from seed, which is a great gain, as single
flowers are really of little use for decorative purposes. What I admire
about them is the large number of self-colored flowers that are produced.
The bulk of them are deliciously scented, and all fringed at the edges
of the petals. When the weather permitted the plants were assigned a
position out of doors where they could obtain all available sunlight,
were given plenty of space, and well supplied with water at the roots.
Directly the pots in which they were to flower were full of roots, weak
liquid manure was supplied to them freely. By the early part of July
they commenced to flower, and kept on unceasingly until the early part
of November out of doors. Where buttonhole bouquets are in demand these
Marguerite carnations afford excellent material for the making of this
favorite adornment, and as the carnation is a popular flower for the
purpose this new race is doubly valuable.”

       *       *       *       *       *

SITUATIONS WANTED.

_Advertisements of gardeners and florists desiring situations will be
inserted under this head free._

       *       *       *       *       *

A FIRST-CLASS GARDENER AND FLORIST, single, 27 years of age of temperate
habits, Hollander, but speaking English, with the best of reference,
wants a situation as private gardener. Apply to “Hollander,” care Vick
Seed House, Rochester, or at Vander Meulen’s Greenhouses, Dunkirk, N. Y.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

World’s Fair comes to “THE PAGE”!

At least the President does when he wants fence. Last month his Manager
called on our agent and bought 500 rods. It’s now delivered and paid for,
at the same price =you= can buy. Plenty of fences “just as good” were
offered at =cut rates=, but four years’ trial beats a =Medal= with Hon.
Thomas W. Palmer.

=PAGE WOVEN WIRE FENCE CO., Adrian, Mich.=




A PRETTY FLOWER STAND.


Here is something you can make for yourself before another summer comes.
This is a flower stand, and the simplest contrivance! Saw off an old
cedar tree about two feet below the first branch, then saw it off again
about two feet above the first branch. The thicker the branches on this
unsightly stump the better for your purpose. The branches must next be
chopped off irregularly, leaving some a yard and some half a yard in
length. Bury the lower end of the stump about one foot in the ground, and
on the end of each branch nail a piece of board about ten inches square
to serve as a shelf. These shelves must be firmly nailed so that boxes
or pots can be set upright on them. Now paint the whole thing green and
you have a pretty flower stand. You will not believe it until you try
it, but it is beautiful. Instead of bedding out the plants you wish for
winter flowering, try the plan of keeping them on this stand out of doors
during the summer, where they will get all the benefit of the sun and
dew. On the approach of winter they will only need to be brought indoors,
and will be in a much better condition for blooming than if they had been
taken up at the risk of breaking half their roots and potted in a hurry.

                                                          PRUDENCE PLAIN.

       *       *       *       *       *

=$12 TO $35 PER WEEK Can be made by working for us.= Parties preferred
who have a horse and can give their whole time to our business. Even
spare time will play splendidly. This announcement is of special interest
to farmers and farmers’ sons, and others residing in the rural districts.
A few vacancies also in towns and cities.

=B. F. Johnson & Co., No. 5 South 11th St., Richmond, Va.=

       *       *       *       *       *

MY WIFE CANNOT SEE HOW YOU DO IT AND PAY FREIGHT.

[Illustration]

$14 Buys our 2 drawer walnut or oak =Improved High Arm Singer= sewing
machine finely finished, nickel plated, adapted to light and heavy
work; guaranteed for =10 Years=; with =Automatic Bobbin Winder=,
=Self-Threading Cylinder Shuttle=, =Self-Setting Needle= and a complete
set of =Steel Attachments=; shipped any where on =30 Day’s Trial=. No
money required in advance. 75,000 now in use. World’s Fair Medal awarded
machine and attachments. Buy from factory and save dealer’s and agent’s
profits.

=FREE=

=Cut This Out= and send to-day for machine or large free catalogue,
testimonials and Glimpses of the World’s Fair.

=Oxford MFG. CO. 342 Wabash Ave. CHICAGO, ILL.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

=Award of Highest Prize= at =World’s Fair=, ratified by verdict of “=The
Multitude=.” Our “=Modern Bath=” an ornament and source of joy in any
home. Send 2 cts for catal’g illust’g 18 styles Tub. Improved Water
Heaters, etc.

=MOSELY FOLDING BATH TUB CO., 181 W. South Canal Street, CHICAGO, ILL.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: High Arm Warranted Ten Years.]

FREE TRIAL in your own home for 30 days without paying one cent in
advance; machine to be returned at our expense if unsatisfactory. We take
all risks, =pay freight=, ship anywhere, to anyone, in any quantity at
=wholesale prices=. $65 =Kenwood= machine, =$24.50=; $55 =Arlington=,
=$20.50=; $45 Arlington, =$17.50=; $35 High Arm Gem, =$12=. We sell
all makes and styles, from cheapest $7.95 to best “Kenwood,” $24.50.
=All attachments free.= THREE HIGHEST WORLD’S FAIR MEDALS AWARDED. Over
100,000 now in use. Buy direct from factory. Save agents large profits.
Catalogue and testimonials =free=. =Write at once.= Address (in full)
=CASH BUYERS’ UNION 158-164 W. Van Buren St., Dept. A 43, Chicago, Ill.=

       *       *       *       *       *

CHRYSANTHEMUMS

Choice Seed, 25c. packet. Circular free.

T. H. SPAULDING, Orange, N. J.

       *       *       *       *       *

=READER If You Love RARE FLOWERS= _choice only_, address =ELLIS BROS.,
Keene, N. H.= It will astonish and please. ☞ =FREE=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

=MUSICAL CLOCK & Box Combined.= Runs 8 days, keeps perfect time & furnish
constantly all the most charming & popular tunes. Plays anything from a
simple song to a difficult waltz or operatic selection. To introduce it
one in every county or town furnished reliable persons (either sex) who
will promise to show it. Send at once to =Inventor’s Co., New York City,
P. O. Box 2252=.

       *       *       *       *       *

RARE FLOWERS FREE!

We want all to try our Northern Grown seeds, so for 30 days only we will
send the following (well worth $1.00) =FREE=:

    =Giant Petunias=, 5 in. across, beautifully stained.
    =Golden Gate Poppies=, hundreds of beautiful colors.
    =Snowball Pinks=, white as winter snows.
    =Royal Prize Pansies=, 3 inches across, all colors.

Also a 20-cent coupon and our beautifully illustrated catalogue for 1894.
Enclose 6c. for postage, and address =O. M. RICHARDSON & CO.=, Florists,
Canton, Maine. Mention this paper.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

All about Poultry for a 2c. stamp.

=S. M. T. JOHNSON, Box 11, Binghamton, N. Y.=

       *       *       *       *       *

=DRUNKENNESS Is a DISEASE.= =It can be Cured= by administering =Dr.
Haines’ Golden Specific=. It can be given without the knowledge of
the patient, if desired, in coffee, tea or articles of food. Cures
guaranteed. Send for circulars. =GOLDEN SPECIFIC CO., 185 Race St.,
Cincinnati, O.= ☞ =_The Only Cure. Beware of Imitators._=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

45 Yards High Class Fowls.

=THE WORLD’S FAIR Highest Awards, MEDAL and DIPLOMA, on our INCUBATOR and
BROODER Combined.= If you are interested in Poultry, it will pay you to
send 4 cents in stamps for 72 page catalogue, giving valuable points on
Poultry Culture. Address

=Reliable Incubator Co., Quincy, Ill.=

       *       *       *       *       *

OPIUM

Morphine Habit Cured in 10 to 20 days. No pay till cured. DR. J.
STEPHENS, Lebanon, Ohio.

       *       *       *       *       *

Teeth White as Snow.

I have a simple and harmless preparation which will make the teeth PEARLY
WHITE. Sample box 15c. or sample and recipe of Tooth Whitening 25c.,
postal note or stamps.

MATTIE M. CRON, CROMWELL, IND.

       *       *       *       *       *

LADY

AGENTS clear $100 monthly. =100 New Ladies’ Specialties= for Old and
Young. 64 page Illust’d Catalogue =FREE=. G. L. Erwin & Co., Chicago, Ill.

       *       *       *       *       *

LADIES who will do writing for me at their homes will make good wages.
Reply with self-addressed stamped envelope.

MISS MILDRED MILLER, South Bend, Ind.

       *       *       *       *       *

WOMEN WHO CAN CROCHET

and have a few hours’ spare time can get work to do =at home= to occupy
their spare time =profitably=. Address

L. WHITE & CO., 209 STATE ST., CHICAGO, ILL.

       *       *       *       *       *

YOU

You can now grasp a fortune. A new guide to rapid wealth, with =240= fine
engravings, sent =free= to any person. This is a chance of a lifetime.
Write at once. =Lynn & Co. 48 Bond St. New York=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: CORNS CURED]

FREE.

Send for =Free= Sample Bottle. Regular size 25c.

COHN’S, 332 W. 51 St., N. Y.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

☞ For 6 two-cent stamps we will send you a brilliant Gem of unusual color
and a copy of “_The Great Divide_,” provided you write you saw this in
Vick’s Magazine. Address, “The Great Divide,” Denver, Colo.

       *       *       *       *       *

EUROPE

Holy Land, California, Bermuda, Florida, Mexico, etc. Select parties;
best ticketing facilities; choicest ocean berths. Send for “TOURIST
GAZETTE.”

=H. GAZE & SONS, 113 Broadway, New York.=

(Est. 1844.) Official Ticket Agents Chief Trunk Lines.

       *       *       *       *       *

Greenbacks.

$150.00 for $5.00; genuine Confederate States greenbacks; in common
bluebacks. Terms 4 cts. A. L. NAPLES, Mulberry, Kansas.

       *       *       *       *       *

NEW PLAYS

READINGS, RECITATIONS, CATALOGUES FREE!!! DE WITT, ROSE ST., N. Y.

       *       *       *       *       *

GREEN’S Fruit Guide and Catalogue

=80 PAGES, 9 COLORS, ILLUSTRATED. Free to all who Apply.=

Trees, Plants, Vines, Small Fruits, Roses, Ornamentals

_SIXTY THOUSAND PATRONS. ESTABLISHED 20 YEARS. 2 NURSERIES._

=See Green’s Monthly—“Fruit Grower”—Sample Free. 100,000 Readers. 50 cts.
a Year.= Address =GREEN’S NURSERY CO., Rochester, N. Y.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: James Vick’s Sons, SEEDSMEN

Rochester, N. Y.

Danvers Yellow Globe Onion Seed, $1.00 Per Pound, delivered, and other
Reliable Seeds in proportion.]

_Tested and Tried, Proven Good, are all the Seeds and Plants we offer._

_Vick’s Seeds HAVE “GROWN” for over Forty Years, and will continue to do
so._

_We Pay the postage or express charges, except when noted._

VICK’S FLORAL GUIDE, 1894, 112 pages of Flowers and Vegetables, will be
sent for ten cents, which can be deducted from first order.




HANGING BASKETS.


Only certain kinds of plants are suitable for hanging baskets; such as
are of low compact growth, to cover the surface, and such as are of
drooping or trailing habit, to hang over the sides, are best for the
purpose. For the center use some graceful plant of upright growth. In
setting the plants in hanging baskets a layer of moss at least one inch
in depth should be spread over the bottom and sides, so that the water
may be held and prevented from washing through. To have the plants bloom
freely they should be hung where they will be exposed to the sun at least
two hours every day, and in dry weather they need copious watering. A
good plan is to dip the whole basket in water until it is thoroughly
soaked. It can be allowed to drip before being again hung up. Watered in
this way the soil retains the moisture much better than when the water is
only poured on the plants.

Panicum variegatum is one of the most valuable plants I have tried for
baskets or vases. It is a species of grass from New Caledonia, of very
graceful habit of growth, with beautiful variegated foliage striped,
white, carmine and green. The ivy-leaved geraniums are excellent climbing
or trailing plants adapted to hanging baskets. They have a fine, thick,
glossy foliage, which of itself would warrant their cultivation, but they
also have the charming attraction of possessing beautiful flowers as well
as foliage. Any one who once succeeds in getting a good variety started
in a basket will never allow their window garden to be without a plant of
this kind, as they all bloom with the greatest freedom. Chas. Turner is
my favorite variety of the ivy-leaved geraniums.

Nasturtiums are lovely in a “rustic” hanging basket, that is, one made of
rough and gnarled roots and limbs of trees. All the varieties of oxalis
are pretty grown in earthenware baskets, and wire baskets lined with
bright green moss are especially suitable for the different varieties of
tradescantia, or “wandering jew.” There is a drooping variety of cactus,
Cereus flagelliformis, admirably suited for hanging baskets. I have seen
this planted in a large ox horn suspended by chains, and it made a most
unique ornament.

                                                          PRUDENCE PLAIN.

       *       *       *       *       *

THE UNEMPLOYED IN ENGLAND.—The sufferings of the unemployed in England,
if not greater, are at least more vocal than ever, and remarkably various
are the remedies proposed. Besides the project already named, Mr. Keir
Hardie suggested to Parliament the establishment of an eight hours day
and the prohibition of overtime in Government factories, the reclamation
of waste lands and foreshores, the reafforesting of the country, and
the provision of suitable accommodation for the aged poor. The _Daily
Chronicle_ revives an old scheme for reclaiming the Wash, and so adding
a “new country” to England. Mr. Chamberlain’s hope is for extended
markets for national trade. A conference of vestries, presided over by
Lord Onslow, proposed to Mr. Gladstone the formation of light railways,
made and worked as in Ireland, to carry away the refuse of London. The
gravity of this problem throughout the United Kingdom can hardly be
overestimated, and its conditions are not so transient as those in the
United States. There is no such “army of unemployed” in Chicago or New
York as in London.—_From the “Progress of the World,” in the February
Review of Reviews._

       *       *       *       *       *

TO CATARRH SUFFERERS

A clergyman, after years of suffering, from that loathsome disease,
Catarrh, and vainly trying every known remedy, at last found a medicine
which completely cured and saved him from death. Any sufferer from this
dreadful disease sending his name and address to Prof. Lawrence, 88
Warren Street, New York, will receive the means of cure free and postpaid.

=When writing to advertisers, mention Vick’s Magazine.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: Send $2.00 for a large FUR RUG]

=5½ feet long by 33 inches wide.= Made from selected skins of the
Japanese Angolia. Long, soft, silky fur.

The colors are _Silvery White_, _Light Grey_ and _Dark Grey_. ☞ We also
have a beautiful =Glossy Black Fur Rug at $3.00=. Same size. Comfortable,
luxurious, elegant. For Parlors, Reception Halls, or Bed Rooms. Sent C.
O. D. on approval if desired.

=THE LAWRENCE, BUTLER & BENHAM CO.= 94 High Street, COLUMBUS, O.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: AUTOMATIC SHELL EXTRACTOR

DOUBLE-ACTION

$4.50

WORTH $15.00]

=HILL—He Pays the Express= on this American-made Revolver. Full Nickel
Plated, Rubber Stock, Center Fire, 32 or 38 Caliber, Five Shot, 8-in.
long, rifle barrel 3¼ inch Long fluted cylinder, Low curved hammer which
prevents accidental discharge. Weight 16 oz. Cut this out and we will
ship by express C. O. D. $4.50, we pay all charges.

W. HILL & Co., 207 State Street, Chicago.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

Warranted. Light Running.

HIGHEST MEDAL awarded to MAJESTIC Only Medal for Sewing Machine
Attachments

Why? Send for catalogue

TILTON SEWING MACHINE CO., 275 Wabash Ave., Chicago

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

BEAUTIFUL SHAWLS

FREE

Owing to the failure, during the recent panic, of a large manufacturer
of =Fine Cashmere Shawls= we were enabled to secure an enormous quantity
of Plaid Shawls at a fraction of the cost to manufacture, and propose
to =give them away absolutely Free= as follows: To every person who
sends us =25= cents for one year’s subscription to =MODERN STORIES=, a
large 16-page handsomely illustrated story and family paper, containing
fascinating stories and a choice piece of sheet music each issue, by
authors of worldwide reputation, we will send one shawl absolutely
=FREE=. Remember there are no conditions, our offer is fair, square and
absolute. Every person who cuts this ad. out and returns to us with =25=
cents for our paper one year gets a shawl =FREE=. If you want one send
=now=. Address,

=MODERN STORIES, 87 Warren St., New York=

=When writing to advertisers, mention Vick’s Magazine.=

       *       *       *       *       *

VICKS’ Brilliantly Beautiful INVINCIBLE SWEET PEAS

[Illustration]

SUPERIOR SELECTED STRAINS.

We have for several seasons applied our best efforts towards improving,
perfecting, as well as increasing, our stock of the mixture which we
introduced last season as “VICK’S INVINCIBLE,” and which we know will
please the most exacting. For flowers of lively yet delicate colors,
varying from the pearly white to the darkest and richest reds and
purples, this “Invincible Mixture” _leads_ because it is the result of
culling, season after season, only the choicest and the best from the
flowers of the year previous. The many and various colored and shaded
blooms cannot fail to give perfect satisfaction.

=Price, Vicks’ Incredible Mixed Sweet Peas, per packet 15 cents; two for
25 cents; ounce 50 cents.=

JAMES VICK’S SONS, Rochester, N. Y.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: TREES AND PLANTS.

Upon our 250 acres of nursery we have every class of hardy Trees and
Plants; Fruit, Ornamental, Nut and Flowering. =Mary= and =Henry Ward
Beecher= Strawberries and =Lovett’s Best= Blackberry are among the
most valuable novelties. In our catalogues named below (which are the
most complete, comprehensive and elaborate published by any nursery
establishment in the world) all are accurately described and =offered at
one-half the price of tree agents=.

=LOVETT’S GUIDE TO FRUIT CULTURE= tells all about fruits, their merits
and defects; how to plant, prune, cultivate, etc. Richly illustrated.
Several colored plates. Price 10c.

=LOVETT’S MANUAL OF ORNAMENTAL TREES AND PLANTS= is authoritative as well
as instructive; a model of excellence in printing and illustration. Gives
points and plans for ornamental planting. Price, with colored plates, 15
cents.

=Established 40 years. We successfully ship to all parts of the World.=
All who order either of the above and name this paper will receive an
ounce of Flower Seeds _free_.

J. T. LOVETT CO. LITTLE SILVER, N. J.]

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: SPRAY YOUR FRUIT TREES & VINES]

=Stahl’s= Double Acting Excelsior Spraying Outfits prevent Leaf Blight
& Wormy Fruit. Insures a heavy yield of all Fruit and Vegetable crops.
Thousands in use. Send 6 cts. for catalogue and full treatise on
spraying. _Circulars free._

=_WM. STAHL, Quincy, Ill._=

       *       *       *       *       *

GIVE UP TRYING TO GET SATISFACTORY RETURNS FROM POOR SEEDS.

Vicks’ Seeds Contain the Germ of Life

THEY GROW—THEY FLOURISH—THEY PRODUCE ABUNDANTLY.

SOW VICKS’ SEEDS AND REAP GLORIOUS REWARDS.

You Get the Best only from JAMES VICK’S SONS, Rochester, N. Y.

       *       *       *       *       *

$120.00 PER MONTH

IN YOUR OWN LOCALITY

made easily and honorably, without capital, during your spare hours. Any
man, woman, boy or girl can do the work handily, without experience.
Talking unnecessary. Nothing like it for money making ever offered
before. Our workers always prosper. No time wasted in learning the
business. We teach you in a night how to succeed from the first hour.
You can make a trial without expense to yourself. We start you, furnish
everything needed to carry on the business successfully, and guarantee
you against failure if you but follow our simple, plain instructions.
Reader, if you are in need of ready money, and want to know all about the
best paying business before the public, send us your address, and we will
mail you a document, giving you all the particulars.

=TRUE & CO., Box 1398, Augusta, Maine.=

=When writing to advertisers, mention Vick’s Magazine.=

       *       *       *       *       *

DO YOU GROW “POSIES”

If so, send for Catalogue of PLANTS & SEEDS, and compare with others
before you order. We send a packet of our celebrated “PRIZE” ASTERS Free,
with Catalogue, if you mention this paper.

Address, The CALLA GREENHOUSES, Calla, O.

       *       *       *       *       *

SEEDS FREE FOR TRIAL

We have the Finest and Cheapest Seeds to be found in the world and we
want every reader of this paper to try one of the following collections
Free. They would cost you from 75c. to $1.00 purchased elsewhere.

=1st FREE OFFER, Vegetables=, 1 pkt. each.

    =BEET, Mitchell’s Blood Turnip=, earliest and best.
    =CABBAGE, Surehead=, sure to head.
    =CELERY, Golden Self Blanching=, the best.
    =LETTUCE, Denver Market=, fine new sort.
    =WATERMELON, Dixie=, luscious, great bearer.
    =ONION, Selected Globe Danvers=, standard sort.
    =RADISH, Summer Varieties=, 15 choice kinds.
    =SQUASH, Fordhook=, best, new sort.
    =TOMATO, Picture Rock=, a grand tomato.

=2d FREE OFFER, Rare Flowers.=

    =FORGET-ME-NOT, New Giant Flowered=, large.
    =CANDYTUFT, Fancy Mixture=, best bouquet sorts.
    =CALENDULA, Double White=, very showy.
    =CLARKIA, Salmon Queen=, richest col’d double.
    =CHRYSANTHEMUM, White Bouquet=, fine flower.
    =GAILLARDIA, Perpetual Flowered=, rich, showy.
    =POPPY, Riverdale Mixture=, fancy sorts only.
    =SCABIOSA, Dwarf, Double Striped=, lovely, grand.
    =SNAPDRAGON, Show Mixed=, penciled blossoms.
    =ORNAMENTAL GRASSES=, 25 choice sorts.

Either of the above collections, (9 packets Vegetable seeds, or 10
packets flower seeds) =Mailed Free= on following conditions: Send us 10c.
for either of above collections, or 20c. for both, and we will mail them
to you; also “Book on Summer Gardening,” and include in each lot a check
for 10c. This check you can return to us at any time and get 10c. worth
of seeds, thus the collection really costs you nothing. (We charge this
10c. to prevent people from sending who have no use for the seeds.) We
want you to try our seeds.

☞ Both collections, book, and packet each of the lovely early =Carnation
Marguerite= and profuse blooming =Begonia Vernon= and a 25c. check for
25c. Book free to seed buyers.

=J. J. BELL, Flowers, Broome Co., N. Y.=

       *       *       *       *       *

SEEDS BOX WORTH $3.50

35 Regular Size Packets, ONLY 50 CENTS.

The great demand for our 50 cent Complete Garden Collections in years
past induces us to offer the same again. Many who have tried every
collection they have seen advertised, pronounce this the greatest bargain
they have ever obtained. OUR SEEDS ARE THE BEST AND CHEAPEST, AND WE
OFFER THESE GREAT INDUCEMENTS TO GET EVERYBODY TO TRY THEM. This Great
=COMPLETE GARDEN= Box contains One Packet each,

    =ASPARAGUS, Barr’s Mammoth=, giants, good qual.
    =BUSH BEAN, Rust Proof Wax=, best bean grown.
    =POLE BEAN, Golden Champion=, productive, good.
    =CABBAGE, All Head=, large, sure header.
    =CUCUMBER, New Everbearing=, early, productive.
    =CORN, White Cory=, earliest, best, sweetest.
    =LETTUCE, Grand Rapids=, best forcing.
    =MUSKMELON, Netted Gem=, unsurpassed quality.
    =WATERMELON, Dixie=, luscious; has no equal.
    =ONION, Early White=, early, sure cropper.
    =PEAS, Bell’s Extra Early=, best early.
    =PARSNIP, Improved Guernsey=, best for table use.
    =RADISH, 15 Choice Summer Sorts. Mixed.=
    =SQUASH, Fordhook=, best for general use.
    =TOMATO, New Stone=, solid, large, good.
    =5 PACKETS Other Choice Vegetables.=

=15 PACKETS Choice Flower Seeds=, including such sorts as Cozy’s Canna,
Sweet Nicotiana, Etc.

All the above, (best outfit for a complete vegetable and flower garden
ever offered)—20 full packets choice vegetables, and 15 packets rare
flowers in a box with our new Book on Summer Gardening by mail postpaid
for only 50c. Send for it. Address, =J. J. BELL, Flowers, Broome Co., N.
Y.=

       *       *       *       *       *

CHOICE ROSES AT 5 Cts.

[Illustration: Good & Reese’s Roses are on their own roots.]

OUR RAINBOW COLLECTION OF 20 ROSES FOR $1. PREPAID BY MAIL.

The roses we send are on their own roots, from 10 to 15 inches high, and
will bloom freely this summer either in pots or planted in yard. They are
hardy, ever bloomers. We send instructions with each order how to plant
and care for them. Please examine the below list of 20 choice fragrant
monthly roses, and see if you can duplicate them anywhere for an amount
so small as =$1=. They are nearly all new kinds.—We guarantee them to
reach you in good condition, =and we also guarantee them to be the best
dollar’s worth of roses you have ever purchased=. =THE RAINBOW COLLECTION
OF 20 ROSES FOR ONE DOLLAR MUST BE ORDERED COMPLETE.=

The List:—=Bridesmaid=, the best pink rose by far ever introduced.
=Princess of Wales=, amber yellow, deepening to orange. =Snowflake=, pure
white, always in bloom. =Princess de Radziwell=, lovely coral red. =Pearl
of the Gardens=, deep golden yellow. =Beauty of Stapleford=, bright
rosy crimson. =Queen of Fragrance=, in clusters of six to ten roses,
white edged pink. =Rheingold=, beautiful shades of saffron and tawn.
Sunset, golden amber, resembles an “afterglow.” =Dr. Grill=, coppery
yellow and fawny rose. =Duchess Marie Immaculata=, an intermingling of
bronze, orange, yellow, pink and crimson. =Lady Castlereagh=, soft rosy
crimson and yellow. =Papa Gontier=, lovely dark red. =Star of Gold=, the
queen of all yellow roses. =Waban=, a great rose in bloom all the time.
=Lady Stanley=, great garden rose. =Viscountesse Wautier=, one of the
best roses grown. =Cleopatra=, soft shell pink, lovely. =Sappho=, fawn
suffused with red. =Letty Coles=, very chaste and beautiful.

THE PROOF OF THE PUDDING IS IN THE EATING.

This applies to Floral matters as well as to matters culinary.

                                         Ballinger, Texas, Nov. 29.

    The GOOD & REESE CO., Springfield. O. Gentlemen: The 20 ever
    blooming roses you sent me for $1. arrived yesterday in the
    most splendid condition, and allow me to say that I was
    absolutely surprised at the size of the stalks and the amount,
    length and thriftiness of the roots. I have wondered many times
    how you could afford to send out such roses for such a small
    price. Every home in the land should have their yard full of
    ever blooming roses at this price.

                              Yours,

                                          (Judge) C. H. WILLINGHAM.

                                   Pittsburgh, Pa., Sept. 20, 1893.

    The GOOD & REESE CO., Springfield, O. Gentlemen: I wish to
    thank you for the excellent assortment of roses contained in
    your Rainbow Collection. On May 3, I planted them, 19 of them
    lived. About six of them bloomed in June, since which all have
    bloomed either monthly or perpetual, true to their color. On
    Sept. 1, I counted 106 buds and blooms on the 19 roses. They
    were much admired by my friends and neighbors, and allow me to
    thank you for furnishing this source of pleasure so cheaply.

                        Very respectfully,

                                                       E. D. SMITH.

    82 Fifth Avenue.

=We will also send our Iron Clad Collection of 12 Hardy Roses, all
different colors, $1. Try a set. 20 Chrysanthemums, all prize winners.
$1. 16 Geraniums, double and single, flowered and scented, $1. 12 choice
Begonias, different kinds, $1. 40 packets choice Flower Seeds, all
different kinds, $1.= Our handsome, illustrated, 152-page Catalogue,
describing above Roses, Plants and all Seeds, mailed for 10c. stamps.
Don’t place your order before seeing our prices. =WE CAN SAVE YOU MONEY.=
We have =large two year old Roses for immediate effect=. =Liberal
Premiums to club raisers, or how to get your seeds and plants free. We
are the LARGEST ROSE GROWERS IN THE WORLD. Our sales of Rose Plants alone
last season exceeded a million and a half.= When you order Roses, Plants
and Seeds, you want the very best. Try us. Address

GOOD & REESE CO., Box 44 Champion City Greenhouses, Springfield, Ohio.

       *       *       *       *       *

PEACH YELLOWS.—This disease is making considerable trouble in certain
parts of the country. It attacks trees about the time they are coming
to the age of most prolific bearing to such an extent that in certain
portions of the peach-growing regions healthy old trees are unknown.
The symptoms of the disease are: Yellowish-green color of leaves; small
leaves tinged with red; the new shoots small, wiry, and clustered,
especially when growing upon the trunk or larger branches; fruit
ripens prematurely, is highly colored, and insipid or bitter to the
taste. The sickly yellowish-green foliage may be due to injury or lack
of nourishment, but when coupled with the other characters given the
presence of the “yellows” can be considered as certain. The only sure way
is to dig out and burn every tree as soon as it is seen to be affected.
This plan has been followed in Michigan, where, between 1870 and 1880,
the disease was very bad. Now hardly a case of “yellows” can be found
in many of the peach regions. Constant attention and prompt action have
proved successful, in this case, at least.

       *       *       *       *       *

SELECTED SEEDS 8 pkts. for 25 cents. Sweet Pea, Aster, Pansy, Phlox,
Poppy, Petunia, Zinnia, and Marguerite Carnation (or 60 Oxalis Bulbs). G.
T. GRAEFF, Box 1576, Philadelphia, Pa.

       *       *       *       *       *

$5.00 Worth for $1.00!

“=The Cream of New Chrysanths.=”

Pres. Smith, Maud Dean, Kate Brown, G. W. Childs, Nivens, Mrs. F. L.
Ames, Hicks Arnold, Golden Gate.

This set of 8 Gems $1.00; 6 sets $5.00, by mail. Mention this Magazine,
and we will give you free 2 Choice Carnations.

=McMULLEN & PASFIELD=, 20 Bedford Avenue, =Brooklyn, N. Y.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

Straws show which way the wind blows. Watch them—and be convinced. When
you see all sorts of washing powders patterned after _Pearline_; when you
see it imitated in appearance, in name, in everything except merit; when
you find three persons using _Pearline_ where two used it a year ago;
when you hear it as a household word with the best housekeepers; when you
find its former enemies now its staunchest friends;—then you may know the
wind is taking you along toward _Pearline_.

Why not go with it? You are losing money by trying to head the other way;
money, and labor, and time and patience.

Go with the rest—use _Pearline_—and you stop losing, and begin to
gain. Millions realize that there is everything to gain and nothing to
lose—with _Pearline_.

Blowing

Peddlers and some grocers will tell you, “this is as good as” or “the
same as Pearline.” IT’S FALSE—but what a puff for Pearline.

JAMES PYLE, New York.

       *       *       *       *       *

The Innisfallen Greenhouses

=Have been favorably known for more than twenty years=, and always give
satisfaction. In order to increase my business, I make the following

_SPECIAL OFFERS_

=which are marvels of cheapness=.

[Illustration]

NEW EVER-BLOOMING DWARF CALLA,

“THE GEM”

This is a novelty of great merit. The only objection to the old variety
is that it sometimes grows tall and scraggly, but the “=Little Gem=”
is of strong and dwarf habit. The foliage which is of a lustrous dark
green is in great abundance. The flowers are produced in the greatest
profusion, being literally an ever-bloomer, it will bloom freely all
summer in the open ground, in September it can be lifted and potted and
will continue blooming all winter. The “Little Gem” Calla will continue
to grow and bloom for years without ceasing, and the quantity of flowers
which a large plant will produce is astonishing, the flowers are snowy
white in color, and of good size, it seldom grows higher than fifteen
inches. Price for plants that will bloom this season, =30 cents each=.
=For $1.00 I will mail 5 plants to one address.=

=ONLY $1.00= will buy any one of the collections named below, delivered
safely by mail, postpaid, to any address. The collections are all fine,
strong plants of the best varieties and are marvels of cheapness. Every
plant is plainly labeled, and there are no two varieties alike in the
same collection.

=FOR $1.00 I will mail FREE 20 Prize-winning Chrysanthemums; 20 fine
Single and Double Flowering Geraniums for $1.00; 20 Choice Ever-Blooming
Carnations for $1.00; 20 Flowering Begonias for $1.00; 20 Assorted
Flowering Plants for $1.00; 20 Fancy Leaved Coleus for $1.00.=

=For $5.00 you can select any six of the above Collections.=

To every one who sends an order from this advertisement and mentions this
magazine, we will send =FREE= a valuable plant.

=ORDER NOW= _and ask for our CATALOGUE of BEAUTIFUL FLOWERS for 1894_.

CHARLES A. REESER, INNISFALLEN GREENHOUSES, SPRINGFIELD, O.

       *       *       *       *       *

FREE

=A MAGNIFICENT PREMIUM PACKAGE= of =FLOWER SEEDS=. Do =YOU= read this
magazine? VICK’S MAGAZINE says its readers comprise the best people in
the land. Everybody knows that’s so. We want to make you our own friend,
and are willing to make it worth your while to get acquainted. So, if
you will send us =10 cents=, for 3 months subscription to =Homes and
Hearths=, we will send you as a present, transportation prepaid, our
unequalled =Premium Package=, containing 200 choice, fresh, guaranteed
varieties of flower seeds from largest growers, including =Sweet Peas=
(Boreatton, Grand Blue, Queen of England, Isa Eckford, etc.), also
=Pansies= (Rex, Gold Margined, Snow Queen, etc.), =Asters= (Jewel,
Perfection, Victoria, etc.), and many others. The whole is a perfect
wealth of flowers, fit for a royal garden. Homes and Hearths is an
attractive 16-page monthly, with lovely original illustrations, splendid
and absorbing original stories: special departments for news about dress,
FASHIONS and for HOME DECORATION; best selected matter; FIRESIDE FUN; a
perfect Mine of pleasure and value. The cash premiums which you will find
in it are the most liberal ever made. Address =HOMES AND HEARTHS PUB.
CO., New York=.

       *       *       *       *       *

Poppies

=FREE.= Send us 10 cents for a sample copy of =INGALL’S MAGAZINE=
and we will send you a “=YARD OF POPPIES=,” all in their =Beautiful
Colors=—=FREE=. Address =J. F. Ingalls, Lynn, Mass. Box H2=

       *       *       *       *       *

A FINE ROSE

And packet of beautiful =FLOWER SEEDS=, with catalogue, for =10c.=

=ALFRED F. CONARD=, Box 5, =10 West Grove, Pa.=

Late President DINGEE & CONARD CO.

       *       *       *       *       *

_850,000_ GRAPE VINES

=100 Varieties.= Also =Small Fruits, Trees, &c.= Best rooted stock.
Genuine, cheap. =2= sample vines mailed for =10c.= Descriptive price-list
free. =LEWIS ROESCH=, Fredonia, N. Y.




INDEX.


    A Cottage Lot                                         69
    Architects, Curious,                                  66
    Begonias, Perhaps                                     74
    =Book Notice=—
        Our Native Grape                                  72
    Calla, A Yellow-Flowered,                             72
    Cannas, The New French,                               68
    Don’t Forget the Potatoes                             73
    Flower Stand, A Pretty,                               77
    Fruit Trees, Care of,                                 75
    Growing Onion Sets                                    73
    Hanging Baskets                                       78
    =Letter Box=—
        Lady Washington and Other Plants                  70
        Roses in Kansas                                   70
        Ixia—Spider Lily                                  70
        Plants About a Fish Pond                          70
        Osage Orange Hedge                                70
        Vase in a Cemetery                                71
        Carnations in the House                           71
        Madeira Vine                                      71
        Mildew on Cucumber Vines                          71
        Moles                                             71
        Pine Apple Air Plant                              71
        Phyllocactus latifrons                            71
        Mammoth Freesias                                  71
        Wormy Raspberries—Violets—Storing Cauliflower     71
    Mabel Ray’s Lesson                                    65
    March Work                                            72
    Marguerite Carnations                                 77
    Mesembryanthemum                                      76
    Peach Yellows                                         80
    Plant Bed, The,                                       72
    =Poetry=—
        March                                             65
        Vick’s Flowers                                    68
        Lines to a Skunk Cabbage                          68
    Rose Leaves                                           69
    The Difference                                        68
    Unemployed in England, The,                           78
    =Illustrations=—
        Birds Nests                                   66, 67
        Plan of Grounds                                   69

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: D. and C. ROSES]

Will grow anywhere, with a little sunshine, water, and care. You can
learn how to grow them, and every other flower of import, from our

=New Guide to Rose Culture=

for 1894. If you so request, we will send free, this book and a copy of
our Floral Magazine, ‘=Success with Flowers=.’

The Dingee & Conard Company, West Grove, Pa.

=When writing to advertisers, mention Vick’s Magazine.=

       *       *       *       *       *

A BARGAIN Collection of Flower Seeds

19 Choice Annuals (everybody’s favorites), all new fresh seeds, sure to
grow and bloom this season. =Pansy=, 40 colors and markings; =Phlox=, 10
colors; =Verbena=, 18 colors; =Pinks=, 10 colors; =Petunia=, 10 colors;
=Asters=, 12 colors; =Balsam=, 8 colors; =Mignonette Sweet= mixed =Sweet
Peas=, 12 colors and =Sweet Alyssum=.

=FOR 12 CENTS= and the name and address of two of your friends who
grow flowers, I will send, post-paid, the complete collection, one
pkt. each of the ten varieties (enough for any ordinary garden.) This
is a =BONAFIDE= offer, made to introduce my home grown flower seeds to
new customers and which I =guarantee= to please you or the amount paid
refunded, and the seeds given as a present.

Address, =Miss C. H. LIPPINCOTT, 319 and 323 Sixth Street, South,
MINNEAPOLIS, MINN.=

       *       *       *       *       *

SEEDS GIVEN AWAY

FOR TRIAL. I have found that the best way to advertise good Seeds is
to give away a sample for trial. If you will send me a 2-cent stamp to
pay postage, I will mail =free= one package, your selection, of either
Cabbage, Carrot, Celery, Cucumber, Lettuce, Musk or Water Melon, Onion,
Parsnip, Pepper, Pumpkin, Radish, Spinach, Squash, Tomato, Turnip, or of
Flower Seeds—Aster, Balsam, Celosia, Carnation, Mignonette, Pansy, Phlox,
Poppy, Sweet Peas, Zinnia, or Verbena, and one of my 1894 Catalogues.
Under any circumstances do not buy your Seeds until you see it, for I can
save you money. Over 200,000 people say my seeds are the cheapest and
best. I have earliest vegetables on record. Discount and large prizes to
agents. 50 cents worth of Seeds free with $1.00 order. =Write to-day.=
=F. B. MILLS=, Box 30, =Rose Hill, N. Y.=

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration]

ELEGANT PALMS

From India and the Isles of the Sea. 5 Glorious Plants, different sorts,
post paid, 60c. These will grow and flourish everywhere.

PALM SEED.

It is child’s-play to make them grow. Send 5c. postage for our great
catalogue, (130 pages); or catalogue and one large package of 5 different
kinds of Palm seed, free for 20c. postage. 100 packages $10. A child can
sell 100 packages in two evenings after school and make $5.00.

JOHN A. SALZER SEED CO. LA CROSSE, WIS.

       *       *       *       *       *

NORTH STAR CURRANT

IS PERFECTLY HARDY; will stand any climate; STRONGEST GROWER—3 to 4 feet
in one summer. FRUIT LARGE, sweet, most DELICIOUS FLAVOR. BERRIES DO NOT
SHELL OR DROP OFF; MOST PROLIFIC. Picks 25 per cent. more fruit. Full
particulars and fine colored plates FREE.

=THE JEWELL NURSERY CO.=, Nursery Ave. 39, =Lake City, Minnesota=.

=When writing to advertisers, mention Vick’s Magazine.=

       *       *       *       *       *

FREE Catalogue HOME-GROWN NORTHERN SEEDS

[Illustration]

=Guaranteed fresh= and reliable. Large pkts. 2 to 5 cts. _Direct from
Grower._ Novelty presents with every order. Catalogue, =Free=—or with 2
packets Seeds, 5 cents; 35 packets, $1.00. Send to-day.

=A. R. AMES, Madison, Wis.=

       *       *       *       *       *

Banquet Strawberry.

Equal to wild berry in flavor. =CROSBY PEACH, frost proof. Fruits every
year.= COLORED PLATES. Full descriptions. FREE CATALOGUE. All fruits.
Write at once. =HALE BROS., South Glastonbury, Conn.=

       *       *       *       *       *

=CONARD’S SUNSHINE PANSIES and Red, White and Blue SWEET PEAS are the
best.= 1 pkt. each, 2 for 10c. Large pkts. 2 for 20c., with catalogue.
=Alfred F. Conard=, Box 5, =West Grove, Pa.=, _Late Prest, Dingee &
Conard Co._

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: HOW DO YOU SPELL _SOAP_ DEAR? WHY MA, _P-E-A-R-S_ OF
COURSE!]

       *       *       *       *       *

=SEEDS A $3.00 BOX of NEW, RARE and BEAUTIFUL FLOWERS FREE=

=HARD TIMES OFFER=—We know that one trial will convince you that we
have the =BEST= as well as the =CHEAPEST= Seeds to be found anywhere in
America, so we will mail you =FREE= for trial the following 15 Packets of
Choice Seeds and two Grand Bulbs;

=1 BEAUTIFUL SPOTTED GLADIOLUS BULB, sure to bloom. 1 EXCELSIOR TUBEROSE
BULB, Lovely and Fragrant, ☞ BELL’S Show Mixtures are Finest and Rarest
Sorts in the World.=

    =ASTER, Bell’s Show Mixture.=
    =PINK, Bell’s Show Mixture.=
    =VERBENA, Bell’s Show Mixture.=
    =PETUNIA, Bell’s Show Mixture.=
    =PHLOX, Bell’s Show Mixture.=
    =ALYSSUM, White Wave=, Choice White.
    =CALLIOPSIS, Golden Wave=, Extremely Showy.
    =PANSY, Bell’s Ever-blooming Greenland=, Brilliant.
    =COLUMBINE, Queen Victoria=, Choice New D’ble.
    =BUSH MORNING GLORY, Double Violet=, Pretty.
    =GODETIA, Double Show=, New Double, Rare.
    =WONDERFUL MEXICAN PRIMROSE=, Worth 25c.
    =LINUM, Perpetual Flowering=, Blooms all Summ’r
    =SWEET PEAS, Beautiful Home Mixed=, Large Flower
    =HARDY ANNUALS, 400 Choice Sorts=, Mixed.

☞ =All the above 15 Packets Seeds and 2 Bulbs Mailed FREE= on the
following conditions; (This is to prevent people sending who have no use
for them). Send us 25 Cents and we will mail all the above, postpaid,
with our “=Book on Summer Gardening=,” and send you in the box a check
for the 25 cents; this check you can return to us and get 25cts. worth
of Seeds at any time. So you see the box of Seeds costs you nothing. We
have 1200 of the choicest varieties and do this to get your patronage.
Book mailed free on application to all seed buyers. Address, =J. J. BELL,
Flowers, Broome Co., N. Y.=

=GRAND BOX FREE. SEND FOR IT. LOVELY FLOWERS EASILY GROWN.=

       *       *       *       *       *

JOSEPH GILLOTT’S STEEL PENS.

THE MOST PERFECT OF PENS.

Gold Medal, Paris Exposition, 1889,

AND THE AWARD AT THE WORLD’S COLUMBIAN EXPOSITION, CHICAGO.

       *       *       *       *       *

VICKS’ SEEDS ARE GUARANTEED TO CONTAIN THE GERM OF LIFE.

       *       *       *       *       *

The Greatest Medical Discovery of the Age.

KENNEDY’S MEDICAL DISCOVERY

DONALD KENNEDY, OF ROXBURY, MASS.,

Has discovered in one of our common pasture weeds a remedy that cures
every kind of Humor, from the worst Scrofula down to a common Pimple.

He has tried it in over eleven hundred cases, and never failed except in
two cases (both thunder humor). He has now in his possession over two
hundred certificates of its value, all within twenty miles of Boston.

A benefit is always experienced from the first bottle, and a perfect cure
is warranted when the right quantity is taken.

When the lungs are affected it causes shooting pains, like needles
passing through them; the same with the Liver or Bowels. This is caused
by the ducts being stopped, and always disappears in a week after taking
it.

If the stomach is foul or bilious it will cause squeamish feelings at
first.

No change of diet ever necessary. Eat the best you can get, and enough of
it Dose, one tablespoonful in water at bed-time. Read the Label. Send for
Book.

       *       *       *       *       *

The “Charmer” Pea

Pleases Everybody Because:—Very Productive; Highest Quality; Fine Flavor;
Staying Qualities; Great Merit; Deep Green Color, Large Peas, Closely
Packed; Nine in a Pod.

[Illustration]

This new variety of large podded, handsome Table Pea, introduced by us,
jumped at a bound into instantaneous favor all over the United States.

The plants stand from three and a half feet to four feed high, and bear
large, long pods, mostly in pairs, which are packed remarkably close with
flattened, greenish-white, wrinkled peas, and these, when cooked, are of
the finest flavor and color. The weight of the Pea compared to the pod
is much greater than usual, producing more shelled peas than any other
variety.

In season it follows Little Gem and comes before Champion of England.
Both for the market and family garden this Pea will be found of the
highest merit.

Everybody is charmed with this variety, and whether for private use or
marketing, a liberal quantity should be planted.

=Price, per packet 10 cents; per pint 30 cents; per quart 50 cents.=

Vick’s Pea, King of the Dwarfs.

This new seedling, introduced by us, in season follows closely McLean’s
Little Gem, coming into market in the space intervening between the early
and the late varieties. The vines are sturdy and remarkably vigorous,
growing about two inches taller than the Little Gem, and bearing a
profusion of pods and Peas in the pod, with all of the principal dwarf
varieties, including the American Wonder, we find that the King of the
Dwarfs outyields them all by 20 per cent., all planted at the same time,
on the same soil, with equal cultivation.

It is a cross between American Wonder and McLean’s Little Gem, and is the
most promising of forty different seedlings. In flavor it is unsurpassed.

=Price, per packet 15 cents; per pint 75 cents; per quart $1.25.=

=JAMES VICK’S SONS, Rochester, N. Y.=

       *       *       *       *       *

VICKS’ SEEDS DO NOT DISAPPOINT. THE HARVEST IS GREAT.

       *       *       *       *       *

[Illustration: 1894 COLUMBIAS ARE BEYOND CRITICISM]

No bicycle ever made at all approaches them in beauty and style joined to
excellence of construction, none so strongly appeals to the experienced
rider as meeting every requirement of a perfect mount.

The need of repairs for Columbias will be infrequent under our new system
of inspection, which now begins with a scientific analysis of the raw
material by a metallurgist, and only ends when thorough tests have been
made of the complete machine and all its parts.

=1894 Standard Price, $125.00.=

Seven newly designed wheels are shown in our 1894 Catalogue which will
interest every cyclist. Our agents furnish it free, or we mail it for two
two-cent stamps.

POPE MFG. CO.

BOSTON, NEW YORK, CHICAGO, HARTFORD.

       *       *       *       *       *

BRIGGS _PIANOS_. Celebrated for their =Beautiful Tone=, =Action=,
=Design=, and =Great Durability=.

=Easy Terms.= Old instruments taken in exchange. =Write for Catalogue and
Full Information.=

=BRIGGS PIANO CO. 621 Albany Street, Boston, Mass=





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Vick's Illustrated Monthly Magazine,
Volume 17, No. 5, March, 1894, by Various

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK VICK'S ILLUSTRATED MONTHLY, MARCH 1894 ***

***** This file should be named 63196-0.txt or 63196-0.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/6/3/1/9/63196/

Produced by Bryan Ness and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at https://www.pgdp.net

Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions will
be renamed.

Creating the works from print editions not protected by U.S. copyright
law means that no one owns a United States copyright in these works,
so the Foundation (and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United
States without permission and without paying copyright
royalties. Special rules, set forth in the General Terms of Use part
of this license, apply to copying and distributing Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works to protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
concept and trademark. Project Gutenberg is a registered trademark,
and may not be used if you charge for the eBooks, unless you receive
specific permission. If you do not charge anything for copies of this
eBook, complying with the rules is very easy. You may use this eBook
for nearly any purpose such as creation of derivative works, reports,
performances and research. They may be modified and printed and given
away--you may do practically ANYTHING in the United States with eBooks
not protected by U.S. copyright law. Redistribution is subject to the
trademark license, especially commercial redistribution.

START: FULL LICENSE

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full
Project Gutenberg-tm License available with this file or online at
www.gutenberg.org/license.

Section 1. General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works

1.A. By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement. If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or
destroy all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your
possession. If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a
Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound
by the terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the
person or entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph
1.E.8.

1.B. "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark. It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement. There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement. See
paragraph 1.C below. There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this
agreement and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works. See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C. The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the
Foundation" or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection
of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works. Nearly all the individual
works in the collection are in the public domain in the United
States. If an individual work is unprotected by copyright law in the
United States and you are located in the United States, we do not
claim a right to prevent you from copying, distributing, performing,
displaying or creating derivative works based on the work as long as
all references to Project Gutenberg are removed. Of course, we hope
that you will support the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting
free access to electronic works by freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm
works in compliance with the terms of this agreement for keeping the
Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with the work. You can easily
comply with the terms of this agreement by keeping this work in the
same format with its attached full Project Gutenberg-tm License when
you share it without charge with others.

1.D. The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work. Copyright laws in most countries are
in a constant state of change. If you are outside the United States,
check the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this
agreement before downloading, copying, displaying, performing,
distributing or creating derivative works based on this work or any
other Project Gutenberg-tm work. The Foundation makes no
representations concerning the copyright status of any work in any
country outside the United States.

1.E. Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1. The following sentence, with active links to, or other
immediate access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear
prominently whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work
on which the phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed,
performed, viewed, copied or distributed:

  This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
  most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no
  restrictions whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it
  under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this
  eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the
  United States, you'll have to check the laws of the country where you
  are located before using this ebook.

1.E.2. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is
derived from texts not protected by U.S. copyright law (does not
contain a notice indicating that it is posted with permission of the
copyright holder), the work can be copied and distributed to anyone in
the United States without paying any fees or charges. If you are
redistributing or providing access to a work with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the work, you must comply
either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 or
obtain permission for the use of the work and the Project Gutenberg-tm
trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.3. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any
additional terms imposed by the copyright holder. Additional terms
will be linked to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works
posted with the permission of the copyright holder found at the
beginning of this work.

1.E.4. Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5. Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6. You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including
any word processing or hypertext form. However, if you provide access
to or distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format
other than "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official
version posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site
(www.gutenberg.org), you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense
to the user, provide a copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means
of obtaining a copy upon request, of the work in its original "Plain
Vanilla ASCII" or other form. Any alternate format must include the
full Project Gutenberg-tm License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7. Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8. You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
provided that

* You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
  the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
  you already use to calculate your applicable taxes. The fee is owed
  to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he has
  agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the Project
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation. Royalty payments must be paid
  within 60 days following each date on which you prepare (or are
  legally required to prepare) your periodic tax returns. Royalty
  payments should be clearly marked as such and sent to the Project
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the address specified in
  Section 4, "Information about donations to the Project Gutenberg
  Literary Archive Foundation."

* You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
  you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
  does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
  License. You must require such a user to return or destroy all
  copies of the works possessed in a physical medium and discontinue
  all use of and all access to other copies of Project Gutenberg-tm
  works.

* You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of
  any money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
  electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days of
  receipt of the work.

* You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
  distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9. If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work or group of works on different terms than
are set forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing
from both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and The
Project Gutenberg Trademark LLC, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm
trademark. Contact the Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1. Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
works not protected by U.S. copyright law in creating the Project
Gutenberg-tm collection. Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may
contain "Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate
or corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or
other medium, a computer virus, or computer codes that damage or
cannot be read by your equipment.

1.F.2. LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees. YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3. LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from. If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium
with your written explanation. The person or entity that provided you
with the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in
lieu of a refund. If you received the work electronically, the person
or entity providing it to you may choose to give you a second
opportunity to receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund. If
the second copy is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing
without further opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4. Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO
OTHER WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5. Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of
damages. If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement
violates the law of the state applicable to this agreement, the
agreement shall be interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or
limitation permitted by the applicable state law. The invalidity or
unenforceability of any provision of this agreement shall not void the
remaining provisions.

1.F.6. INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in
accordance with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the
production, promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works, harmless from all liability, costs and expenses,
including legal fees, that arise directly or indirectly from any of
the following which you do or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this
or any Project Gutenberg-tm work, (b) alteration, modification, or
additions or deletions to any Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any
Defect you cause.

Section 2. Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of
computers including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers. It
exists because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations
from people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come. In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future
generations. To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation and how your efforts and donations can help, see
Sections 3 and 4 and the Foundation information page at
www.gutenberg.org



Section 3. Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service. The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541. Contributions to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent permitted by
U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is in Fairbanks, Alaska, with the
mailing address: PO Box 750175, Fairbanks, AK 99775, but its
volunteers and employees are scattered throughout numerous
locations. Its business office is located at 809 North 1500 West, Salt
Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887. Email contact links and up to
date contact information can be found at the Foundation's web site and
official page at www.gutenberg.org/contact

For additional contact information:

    Dr. Gregory B. Newby
    Chief Executive and Director
    gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4. Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment. Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States. Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements. We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance. To SEND
DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any particular
state visit www.gutenberg.org/donate

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States. U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses. Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations. To
donate, please visit: www.gutenberg.org/donate

Section 5. General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works.

Professor Michael S. Hart was the originator of the Project
Gutenberg-tm concept of a library of electronic works that could be
freely shared with anyone. For forty years, he produced and
distributed Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of
volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as not protected by copyright in
the U.S. unless a copyright notice is included. Thus, we do not
necessarily keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper
edition.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search
facility: www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

